When thou seest the palm-tree, the palm-tree has seen thee.
The child looks everywhere and often sees nought but the old man, sitting on the ground, sees everything.
The diver-bird cannot catch fish behind his companion.
What the child says, he has heard it at home.
The great calabash-tree has had seed for its mother.
If only the small measure goes to the shop, the millet will last long.
If the dog is not at home, he barks not.
The house-roof fights with the rain, but he who is sheltered ignores it.
Know thyself better than he does who speaks of thee.
If you practise your 'prentice-hand upon large jar, you will break it.
Not to know is bad, not to wish to know is worse.
Meat eats not meat.
But for the wide trowsers, prayer would be scandal.
He who has no mother sucks his grandmother.
If you know the beginning well, the end will not trouble you.
To love the king is not bad, but king who loves you is better.
Whoso knows one who will die with him, he will be his friend in this world.
Man should take as companion one older than himself.
A good action is better than bad action.
A man who touches what you have shut up, should not dwell with you.
What the convalescent refuses, would give pleasure to the dead.
I believe the death, because of the bones.
The born-merchant goes not to the other world.
Before curing ophthalmia, the eyes must be seen.
If the door had daggers, no one would leave the room.
Before one replies, one must be present.
Without fingers the hand would be spoon.
Running about gives no scholars.
If wanted to collect sand, should begin where I am.
He who is scarcely convalescent, can stifle dead man.
He who always turns when sleeping, does it no more in the other world.
Though the wolf be lean, he can contend with a goat.
The cup finds not out its master's death.
If a man makes soup of his tears, do not ask him for broth.
She whom the partridge loves, as she whom he hates, would starve if they forgot to scratch the ground.
The frog enjoys itself in water, but not in hot water.
Many guests matter little to the ass of the inn.
Thou knowest not what man's stomach can contain.
He who takes thy part at the dish to give it to thee, had better allow thee to take it.
He who makes not soup for himself, will not make bouillie for sale.
I want no boiled meat if my head must be the trivet.
When you give man boiled meat for breakfast, you do not pour it into his ears.
He who jumps upon the corn-bundles falls with the ears, and if thou dost not eat them thou wilt be the less charged with eating them.
A woman who has lost her rival has no sorrow.
A subjectless king is no king.
He who wishes to blow out his brains, need not fear their being blown out by others.
Much soup is better than much broth.
Let man be bad if his tongue be good.
The teeth may laugh, but the blood is above them.
Prevent him not who walks in the fire, for it would be a great compliment.
Toasted seeds jump, but they always fall towards their companions.
All men have not wives, and all women are not married.
He who runs away and escapes, is clever.
To run the best, does not give the highest rank.
Before healing others, heal thyself.
A road has no shadow.
If the big finger be greedy, the heel is more so.
A little is better than nothing.
"I have forgotten thy name," is better than " I know thee not."
If the fly flies, the frog goes not supperless to bed.
He who separates men that are fighting, should not strike them.
The hunter who pierces the tree, has not shot well.
Horns grow not before the head.
To cleave water hurts the stomach.
The pigeon of the animal is there.
Deny, but what thou seest believe!
If the bird drinks not at the stream, it knows its own watering place.
The bird can drink much, but the elephant drinks more.
The voice of the pigeon on the spit is not like the voice of the pigeon on the tree.
Lies, however numerous, will be caught by truth when it rises up.
The partridge loves peas, but not those which go into the pot with it.
If the tree under which you pass throw bread to you, you will pass it again to-morrow,
To flatter one who separates us is good, but it is better to flatter one who strikes us.
There are people who place a basket on your head to see what you carry.
Teeth serve as a fence to the mouth.
The dog that has left the house has no master.
If the stomach-ache were in the foot, one would go lame.
Though thou hast no mother-wit, thou knowest that the father's wife is mother.
If the stars were loaves, many people would sleep out.
The sky is the king of sheds.
Night is the queen of shades.
Earth is the queen of beds.
The sun is the king of torches.
If you go to the sparrows' ball, take ears of corn for them.
Before preceding, one must reach.
He who cries to have himself dragged, has no one to carry him.
All the flowers of a tree do not produce fruit.
He who knows swimming, dies not in the water.
If he who buys milk is proud, he who sells it should be prouder.
To vaunt one's goods is good, but it is better to go where they are bought.
The voice of truth is easily known.
A shepherd strikes not his sheep.
If the elephant were to walk about at mid-day, every body would call him.
He will fight tomorrow ; but if there is a dispute, it is today.
We go quickly where we are sent, when we take interest in the journey.
Not to bud, not to eat, not to be cured, give no grain in one's field.
He who weeps from the morning, knows what makes him weep.
Before losing the road, one must rise up.
" Go ! " is better than " Don't go ! "
He who tells you to give away your property, deserves your thanks.
The song of the stomach is hard to hear.
If you fill your mouth with a razor, you will spit blood.
A razor cannot shave itself.
To resuscitate, is easy to Allah.
Time destroys all things.
Patience is good.
Knowledge is good.
One returns not what one hides after finding it.
Power is good.
Thou shalt not contradict an elder's words.
To have plenty to eat, is good for the big belly.
The child hates him who gives it all it wants.
If they smite thee in a place, thou wilt go there no more.
Curiosity often leads men into bitterness.
If the hat drank the brain, nobody would wear it.
The split tree still grows.
To make a summersault, will not remove a rupture.
If Allah gives reason to hate, he also gives reason to love.
Everything that has feathers flies, except the ostrich.
What lowers itself, is ready to fall.
The hind in the sea fears not the hunter.
If ears could stir boiled meat, one would call the pig.
He who has no ears, hears not.
If you have nothing to eat, you will not seek lodgings.
He who covers himself with cotton, should not approach the fire.
The infant sucks only what it finds in its mother's breasts.
He who has no shirt, shows his stomach.
He who has goods can sell them.
Before cooking, one must have provisions.
One laughs not without cause.
Before shooting, one must aim.
If you have a horse, mount it.
Although you have many provisions, you will see the end of them.
He who is born the first, has the most of ragged clothes.
He who begins a conversation, sees not the end.
I have not begotten all that call me sire.
He who wears too fine clothes, shall go about in rags.
He who betrays one that betrays him not, Allah shall betray him.
If live coals fell in the bad weather, no one would go out.
He who says "Scratch me!" shall not be scratched where he wishes.
All that one cuts falls to the ground, except the melon.
No good without truth.
One must talk little, and listen much.
What goes in at one ear goes out by the other.
The best words give no food.
Each for himself, and Allah for all.
Two eyes see better than one.
His eyes are larger than his inouth.
Everybody likes those who like him.
One boat does not load another.
One cannot part two fighting bulls.
One should not press a full man to eat.
No one should say that which he knows not.
He who loves money must labour.
He who writes, rests himself.
If the plate were a man, the soup put into it would make him weep.
He who crosses the sea, is wet.
Those that have long chins cannot kiss one another.
To go where there is no road, is better than to remain without doing anything.
If the bull would throw thee, lie down.
I listen not to the caldron which boils not.
I listen not to the finger that has no nail.
The thing which Allah has placed, cannot be displaced by any one.
He who can do nothing, does nothing.
The more powerful one is in this world, the more servile one will be in the next.
The first who speaks of lawsuit is not always right.
He who loses his enemy, weeps not for him.
If you love the children of others, you will love your own even better.
A severe malady does not always kill.
If you rise too early, the dew will wet you.
No one cuts the serpent's net.
If you trample on the serpent, no one will say to you, " Don't!"
If the child robs when he begins to walk, he will plunder a sheepfold when he grows older.
To place oneself before the sun, does not prevent its continuing its path.
To cover the shade of sand, does not prevent its flying.
Nothing can suffice a man except that which he has not.
He who amuses himself in ell-ing the road, has no stuff to measure.
The rivulet is not a king, yet he who would cross it removes his shoes.
A grain of millet is not worth a calf.
He to whom Allah gives, has.
The bird flies, but always returns to earth.
He who hunts a dog home, then leaves it.
An elephant can do nothing to a tamarind-tree, except it be to shake it.
The caldron has no hair by reason of the fire.
He at whom Allah has discharged a shaft, cannot avoid it.
When the mouse laughs at the cat, there is a hole.
If you weep on entering a house, and also on leaving it, you will never know how many beams it has.
All soldiers are not kings.
The monkey's tail is long, and yet if you touch it, its owner feels.
The shepherd can give sweet milk, but he cannot give a calf.
The sparrow loves millet, but he labours not.
Much millet is good, but it is better to find next year.
Shaving is better than plucking the hair.
Seeing excites to knowing.
The heir thanks nobody but the sudden death.
Trust not a woman: she will tell thee what she has just told her companion.
If you like honey, fear not the bees.
Before eating, open thy mouth.
Where are the cattle, there the wolf shall die.
Tou do not tell a corpse to go to bed.
He who puts aside his spoon to draw from the pot with his hand, does not do so twice.
Those whose saliva is not equal, should not chew flour together.
They who know the unwholesome well, drink not from its water.
One may have much milk, but it is never too white.
If the hat which you try on fits not your head, do not make your neighbour try it.
It is better to walk than to grow angry with the road.
Shaking the head separates not the ears from the ass.
A summersault does not separate the head from the lice.
Boiling in the sand will not loosen the knot which Allah has tied.
Where the chin goes, the eyes carry it.
One walks on the serpent's tracks when it is no longer there.
He who rises early finds the way short.
He who lives upon air has no milk.
If the partridge that scratches when flying should alight at the grange, it will throw the grain about on all sides.
If you meet with those who quarrel, you may take one side, but at least speak the truth.
The tree which is not taller than thou art, cannot shade thee.
If one who knows thee not, or a blind man scolds thee do not become angry.
If thou seekest to obtain by force what the Lord has not given thee, thou wilt not obtain it.
The days being finished, there is no medicine.
Thou seest what is before, not what is behind thee.
Wisdom is not in the eye, but in the head.
If thou givest anything to a blind man, lay it first upon the staff in his hand ere thou givest it to him; in the next world, when he shall say, "thou hast not given me anything!" the staff in his hand will bear witness.
At the bottom of patience there is heaven.
Being prepared before-hand is better than after thought.
He that has no house, has no word in society.
If a woman speaks two words, take one and leave the other.
He is as cunning as a weazel.
If a man confers a benefit upon another, that benefit is not lost (to himself).
Fire devours a man.
He draws near the fire when meat is raw.
One does not love another, if one doed not accept any thing from him.
Hope is the pillar of the world.
Riches are the pillar of the world.
Property is the prop of life.
Hold a true friend with both thy hands.
If thou givest thy heart to a woman, she will kill thee.
I will pay thee when fowls cut their teeth.
It is the heart that carries one to hell or to heaven.
He is a heathen who holds another in his heart.
He who does not believe what the elders say, will not believe the sayings of the Book; and he who does not believe the sayings of the Book, will not believe what the Lord says.
Whatever be thy intimacy, never give thy heart to a woman.
Whatever be the goodness of a slave, he doe3 not come up to a bad son.
A slave is not a thing to be trusted : if thou trustest a slave he will slay thee.
One who has a younger brother, bis secrets are covered.
If one does good, Allah will interpret it to him for good.
If our Lord gives riches to a man, and there are no children, the riches have no word.
The man to whom tlie Lord gives children, his secrets Allah covers.
As to what is future, even a bird with a long neck can not see it, but the Lord only.
Since thou hast no benefactor in this world, the having one in the next will be all the more pleasant.
He whose mother is no more, him distress carries off.
If a man tells his secrets to his wife, she will bring him into the way of Satan.
A woman never brings a man into the right way.
No one can kill the appetite of fowls save Allah.
Nothing in the world loves its young more than a she-slave and an ass.
If thou art poor, do not make a rich man thy friend.
If thou goest to a foreign land, do not alight at a rich man's house.
It became day whilst the hysBna was on its way.
I am King Elephant-bag.
I arose early, but the dawning day overtook me on the way.
If thou dost not know hate, dost thou know indifference?
If I see a small tree, shall I leave it and take a large one?
He has one foot in this world and one in the next.
We shall sleep behind the Koran.
I stand on his head
As for me, I shall not be in your midst.
My heart did not sit down in one place.
My skin is cold.
I put my mouth into the matter.
Allah gives a woman her head.
I tie a face.
Our word never left one and the same road.
They put their words in one and the same place.
What Allah has decreed for us, that we shall see.
Allah give thee good luck.
May Allah take his blessing from you.
One who has been three years married does not go to the Besge, or dancing place of young people.
The dawn has cut through.
The sun is in the centre of the world.
It is forbidden to tell anything that has no foundation.
I tie my heart, or I hold my heart.
A princess never makes a slave her friend.
A hippopotamus exceeds an elephant by one basket of flesh, and an elephant exceeds a hippopotamus by one basket of bones.
One palm tree spoils the palm wine.
If you lay poison, some will touch your mouth.
A child may crush a snail, but it will not crush a tortoise.
If a child does not hear his mother's and his father's word, he shall eat food which does not contain salt.
The tongue kills man and the tongue saves man.
If you are a child do not deride a short man.
A man does not fast without a cause; if he does not suffer hunger, he is in debt.
Hard words are fit for the poor.
When gold comes near to you, it glistens.
You do not always love the same man.
If by bodily strength violence were committed, an elephant would come into the town.
If you never went into another man's plantation, you would say, "I am the only planter."
If you never went into another man's farm, you would say, "I am the king of farmers."
A feast uncovers a European's wooden leg.
There is not a halfpenny in his palace.
This time the short one has got it, but another time the long one will get it, and the short one will not get it.
If you do not praise me, do not spoil my name.
The tortoise says, The hand goes and the hand comes.
A poor man has no friend.
Nobody cooks food and places it in the road to seek a guest.
We know there is blood in our mouth, but we throw out spittle.
Nobody assails a Hahinni at the door of his nest, and says to him, you stink.
If there is nothing in your hand do not shut it, and let the children pick outside.
It is fine, but excites no desire.
If you can pull out, pull out your own grey hairs.
If you are rich, always shut your door.
If there were only snails and tortoises, no gun would ever be fired in the jungle.
The monkey says, that which has gone into his belly is his ; but what is in his mouth is not his.
There is nothing more red than fire.
A person will not say to another, buy salt and eat.
If your hand is in the dish, they can't eat and leave you out.
Poverty makes a free man become a slave.
At the watering place they say, "Lift it for me!"
Saith the fly, " What is left behind is a great deal."
When a fowl eats your neighbour's corn, drive it away ;another time it will eat yours.
If you go to customs with your thumb (stretched out), they will answer you with blows.
The orphan when asked whether he had enough, said, "If you had given to me as you gave to your own child, I should have had enough.
If you are good-natured, you will not give away your wife.
If the child does not honour the aged, it will call a palm branch "haha."
Vulture! thou eatest anybody's egesta, but nobody eats thine..
String added to string will bind even a leopard.
One does not buy a cock, and he does not crow in one's plantation.
When the cry is raised "There goes a witch! There goes a witch!" if you are no witch you will not turn round.
When a man is coming, you will not say " Come ! "
Though your teeth are bad, they are just what you lick.
When the fiend goes to the Sabbat, he lodges with the sorcerer.
Fire and gunpowder do not lie together.
The moon does not appear on one day, does not pass over the town.
When rain falls, and they must remove the things in the rain, it is not them and the stones.
"They shall pull us! they shall pull us!" then we shall sleep without fire.
No one goes ahead of the cock to give salutation.
When a rascal says that he will give you a coat, hear his name.
I who lie on my back do not see the sky, how much more you who lies on your belly.
One does not sweep for another man to carry the dirt.
Akosua does not commit mischief, only for Akua to suffer the consequences.
Though you are hungry, you do not eat with both hands.
For the sake of a day like to-day they have made the nails.
Hai! Hai! has not suffered the hawk to grow big.
A sheep puts his wool on his favourite places.
When a person does his something, let him do it, for death is coming on.
I have seen a baboon, whose wife was dead, and he wore long hair; but thou, antelope, what is that to thee ?
When in consequence of good news spittle is thrown upon the surface of the water, the small fishes snatch it up.
If your master hates you, he calls you a free man.
For the sake of " blow upon my eye for me," two antelopes walk.
Nobody jumps for joy on seeing a strong slave of another.
Nobody will buy the footprints of a bullock.
You say, "I have," not, " We have."
If any one loves you, he will beg of you.
If a tree is bound to a stone, it is hard to cut it.
When your father's slave is chopping wood, he says it is soft.
If you surpass me in eating, I surpass you in sleeping.
If you put two pieces' of iron together in the fire, one will be burned.
As the sword is, so is the scabbard.
Because of friendship, the crab has no head.
When you see the eyes of a crab, you say they are splinters of wood.
Though an elephant be thin, yet you will not divide it up on a palm-leaf.
A papaw-fruit that has not yet ripened on the tree is not yet sweet.
It is when you beat a goat that you find the path to it's owners home.
If you want to say anything to God, tell it to the wind.
He whom you do not respect, will seat himself behind him whom you do respect.
A white eye does not kill a bird.
When the vulture speaks to the big drum he hears it.
If one tongue meets a thousand tongues, it faints.
It's the one who understands the language of the white man that can induce him to do good.
If the head has not been torn to pieces, you do not leave off wearing a hat.
He who is done eating will say, "He who eats at night is a sorcerer."
Nobody shuts his mouth who is innocent.
If one tree receives all the wind, it breaks.
The baboon says, " A strong man dies only from his chest being hurt."
The baboon says, " My charm is my eye."
When a hook beats a stone, it also suffers.
He who fetches water breaks the pot.
If you are sold yourself, you do not buy a gun.
When a fowl from Osukwase eats the corn of Krobo, they do not seize a man from Ashante and make him refund the damage.
When you go to fetch water and do not return, they do not enquire about the pot.
When a Muslim drowns in water, they do not enquire about his dress.
If you make friends on the road, your knife will be lost.
He whose eyes are red, they do not beat upon bis eyes.
The executioner who kills Tabirifo, gets his shoes.
He whom a serpent has bitten dreads a slow-worm.
They who have seen a thing once, say they loathe it.
Troops select farm-houses.
Though strong you will not do the work of two.
A fowl selects a single grain.
Two small antelopes beat a big one.
An elderly person acts as if He did not hear with went on.
If the eaters of enkokonte say they eat soap, you do not doubt it.
When you cut down a palm-tree with the slave of your father, he will call you friend.
Blood is never wanting in the horsefly's head.
Though a mouse were as big as a bullock, yet it would be the slave of the cat.
When the gun powder is finished, it is not that in Akowua's powder-case.
The blind-worm said he would grow before he got his eyes; he is grown, but still he wriggles his head about.
The one who is stronger than you removes your ring through your shoulder.
One eye does not look on a monkey and on a baboon.
The hog says, "It. is not my mouth! it is not my mouth! but still it is his mouth.
If you eat, eat a portion, but do not eat all.
The eye knows nothing of grief.
The entekuma will not sit down nor sleep under the very tree, from eating of which the ananse died.
The chameleon says, " Speed is good, and slowness is good."
When a man becomes rich, the town goes to ruin.
The tortoise says, A man must not be ashamed to run away
If a needle could sew, it would not have a hole on its back.
If you cut off from your tongue and roast and eat it, you have no meat.
If you call your child " Death," it will die.
When the Donko becomes rich he runs mad.
"When an elephant treads upon a spring-trap, it does not spring up.
The crab's daughter does not bear a bird.
Nobody carries foreskins to Hua.
He who circumcises you will not make good carpenter's work.
The salt will not say of itself, "I have a pleasant taste."
Though a horn has a bad sound, yet it is applied to a man's mouth.
Reinforcement beats the foe.
When the nose gets a thing, the eyes get it too.
A forest that has sheltered, you, won't be called a shrubbery.
When a poor man makes a proverb it does not spread.
When a person is sent to look at a snare, the bird does not upbraid him.
The goat says, " Where much blood is, feasting goes on."
Everybody who washes himself with lemon juice, becomes sweet-scented: therefore the red ant said he would go upon the lemon tree and live there, but still he stinks.
If you have no comrades, you do not call for comrades.
Though the beast is dainty-mouthed, it does not eat its collar-bell.
You don't the pluck the feathers of a bird to ask an old man what bird it is.
Because a horse is a fool, he who rides it is no fool.
If you lay a snare in company, you go in company to look at it.
If nothing touches the palm-leaves they do not rustle.
When Eki says he will not fight, he means himself and his party.
The poor man's ivory is a hog's-tooth.
If a string of pearls breaks in the presence of grown up people, nothing is lost.
When an animal fattens, it learns from the pig.
When a way is long you shorten it with your feet, not with a hatchet.
When the mouth stumbles it is worse than the foot.
When boys were to reap, they did not understand it; when old people were to reap, they trampled about.
They say, "Go into a town to settle" and they do not say, " Go into a town to boast."
When yon endeavour to drive the " drivers," and they will not give way, you do not peel palm-nuts and throw among them.
What hunger desires is repletion.
He is a fool whose sheep runs away twice.
The blade of a knife resists in the hand of a boy.
Though you dislike your relation, you will not deliver him to the army
A crooked stick makes us know the carpenter.
When a person says that he will climb up the tree-stump, let him climb: he will go to the the top, and return.
If he who pursues you is not tired, you who are flying will not say, "I am tired."
The cock says, "left to my enemies alone, I should have crowed in the night and would have been killed."
When the teeth do not meet, it is called a diastema.
The son of a Krobo man does not run through the corn without cause.
A canoe is paddled on both sides.
When the cat dies, the mice rejoice.
A half-roof they do not put on.
One head does not go to a standing
When you are not sleepy, you say, "I have no sleeping place."
Food, which you will not eat, you do not boil.
A stranger does not carry the head of a corpse.
A foreign settler does not grow pure.
If, when afflicted with poverty, you eat Abete, it turns to herbs.
Nobody leaves off pursuing an elephant in order to pursue a bird
Though, when going to receive your blows your head aches, yet they strike you in that very place.
"Lay on ! lay on !" makes a load.
Two males do not live in one den.
Having dreamed, nobody will go where they will kill him.
Any work that brings money is not a shame.
A bully fights with his peers, not with grandees.
In the morning the mouth smells, but there are good words in it.
Night venisonis not fat.
Gold is pretty, but the heir is rare.
When you eat a monkey's hand, look at your hand.
A fool says, "My friend is meant, not I."
There is nowhere a wicked prince, but there are wicked ambassadors.
Brave men who went to the war did not see the end how much more a coward.
When the town ornaments your hair, they will not disorder it.
The ear has not a double way.
The antelope says, "When you eat without being tired, it has no relish."
By going and coming, a bird weaves its nest.
As long as you have not got the tortoise, you do not cut the string for him.
When you take another man's hoe to work with, you must wash it, and put it back in its place.
When you destroy yours, you join your friends.
Nobody looks at something black, and steps into it.
When your eye is going to ruin, you will not say, "I hate ophthalmia."
When a slave becomes a free man, he will drink rain water.
When a person neglects to congratulate me, I congratulate myself.
Though your coat is dirty, you do not burn it.
When the fish absorbs the soup, he does it for his master.
When the prince does not please you, see how the general appears.
Nobody gathering mushrooms replaces them on the ant-hill.
Though a slave's name be "Flog," yet you do not flog him without cause.
Who travels alone tells lies.
When anybody prepares food for you, he testifies to you by Ampesi.
If thou, pebble, hastenest to become smooth, they will fight the bird with thee.
When a tall woman carries palm-nuts, the birds will eat them.
In the evening even a red man is black.
When you pine you fade.
They send an intelligent mam; not the one who is able to walk fast.
If an Apopokiki, from the bottom of the river, says that the crocodile is sick, it will not be doubted.
If you cannot dance, you will say, "The drum is not agreeable."
On account of shame, the war-chief's skull sticks on the drum.
A slave does not show the timber.
A slave does not choose his master.
A man alone is no hero.
When the palm-nuts are ripe, you carry half and carry the other half.
Mutual entertainment is fair play.
An expert man cuts the roots in the road.
The eye envies not the ear.
To find a thing when we want it, we make a parcel.
The baboon says, " If you put something into my mouth, then I will produce a good word, and tell you."
When a piece of wood threatens to pierce your eye, you make it blunt, you don't sharpen it. 
"What a foot-traveller eats, tastes well.
A wound does not pain at two halves
If your gold pains you, and you fight, you will not conquer the enemy.
Death's sickle cuts not in one half only.
If another suffers pain, to you a piece of-wood suffers.
A lemon that grows in ripening, is not agreeable.
No one excels a wall in bearing bugs.
When they hold you, you forget to bite.
What is in his hand, the enemy can give away.
Nobody will deceive a baboon by tricks.
Long teeth and short teeth eat the same food.
Old woman! if your mouth is so hard, make your fence yourself.
If you have found an armadillo, you have found meat.
A head they defend it one by one.
If a boy does not understand bartering, he does not lose the gold-weights.
You, what have you done to the fowl, that it is affected with strangury?
The mice eat the miser's goods.
A sharp-sighted bird is caught by Emposai.
Huaabete they eat at home.
On account of food-looking-into, white men went off to Europe.
A miscreant's fellows are not pretty.
If you roast the yam too much, it will be burnt.
If the vulture did not wish to come into the town, he would not be hovering around the refuse dump.
Nobody will deceive a witch by anything red.
When a slave is emancipated, he will call himself a nobleman.
When a woman takes service, she is called a slave.
When a person hates you, he will beat your animals.
A haughty person hates man.
You, traitor! will be left to yourself.
When your comrades take snuff, and you do not, it looks as if your nails were dead.
When the bread runs round, it dances it in the pot.
The roadside pepper-bush says, "If you will break me, break; but do not abuse me."
When the occasion comes, the proverb comes.
When a man is in distress, let them take him.
If sentence is now passed on your neighbour, another time it will be passed on you.
When a bird is in a snare, its cry is peculiar.
You mend (only) a thing that is not good.
If your child deceives the child of your rival, it is not right; and also if the child of your rival deceives your child, it is not right.
If you get presents from any one, you respect him.
If a boy does nine mischiefs, he shall suffer for it five.
If you hate your tooth-brush, your mouth is of ill odour.
When your relation dies, you do not die; but if he is disgraced, you also are disgraced.
On an obsolete resting-place they rest no more.
When your enemy is entangled in a quarrel assist him to settle it; but when he thanks you, do not reply.
The cat does not cease to cry u miau."
A crab does not beget a bird.
A blind man does not show the way to a blind man.
The Kole flows into the sea.
One nut spoils all.
A physician does not drink medicine for the sick.
Gunpowder and fire do not agree.
No land hates a dead body.
Quarrel is not a food which is eaten.
A good word removes anger.
If it is dark, all men are black.
If the horse is mad, he who sits upon it is not also mad.
Clear water is not wanted for quenching fire.
If the Okplom eat something the Ohwam also eats something.
Not with both eyes people look into a bottle.
If one tongue meets with a thousand tongues it faints.
If thou find no fish, thou eatest bread.
A quiet man makes not the noise of an elephant.
One dollar's worth of wares does not allow a man to eat a fowl worth sixpence.
A fly which hovers round a dead body will go with it.
The stick with which people strike a beast in the grass, they do not strike a house-thing with.
The face of water is beautiful, but it is not good to sleep on it.
If thou get, thou askest to put more to it.
If thou cut off thy tongue and roast and gnaw, thou wilt not get an animal to roast and gnaw.
What a Taki is made with, with that they make no Ba.
Dried cassava wants sun.
The terrapin wants not to know its blood, wherefore it contracts its neck and puts it into its shell.
Whoever wants me as I am, is content.
Everybody goes and climbs a tree: the terrapin went and climbed; trouble has come.
Nobody hates anybody without cause.
As for thee, thou sayest that thou hast a good friend; but thou knowest not what he saith behind thy back.
A man is not lean without cause.
If the Enadsi wander, the Ntiblii are among them.
If wood mix with stones, its cutting is difficult.
No one plays under the Hatso, but under the Noko people play.
If hunger eats a stranger, he brought it from his town.
A poor man does not watch over the town.
The brook does not ascend the mountain.
A man moves the wind.
One makes not a people.
The poor man's pipe does not sound.
A curtailed bill-hook does not break twice.
A dead goat does not fear the knife.
Two crocodiles do not live in one hole.
When the big lizard lies in the basket then the small lizard cries " Awo."
If the devil comes to customs, he lodges in the witch's house.
A prince does not run to look at the head.
The cat says "stretching is sweet," wherefore it does not buy a slave.
No one gives a pig to a hyena to keep.
The partridge says, "He who kills me does not grieve me, as he who plucks my feathers."
Nobody measures the river with both his feet.
If a ghost shake thy hand, thine arm shrinks.
The young wild hog asked his mother, "Mamma, what are the warts in thy face?" She replied, " By-and-by thou wilt have seen it already."
If the Didei leaves the river and says that the crocodile is sick, then it is truly sick.
The Alanmali does not play in rocky places.
The horse-fly's head does not lack blood.
If thou hast no bag thou does not go to Wei.
Blood is under the tongue, and people spit saliva.
Nobody knows who bare Okaikoi.
Nobody takes the Sadso and builds a barn with it.
The lizard knows that there is a belly-ache, therefore it lies on its belly for it.
If people say, "Tui !" is the sheep dead ?
The whale is truly very big, but the sea-porcupine kills him.
If the tongue say it be very very long, it cannot vie with the boa constrictor.
Nobody lets go a tree and swings in the air.
Nobody follows an elephant and falls into a trap.
If nothing is in the palm of thy hand, close it not lest children pinch its back.
With a piece of herring they catch the Tsile.
The back of the hand and the palm do not unite.
Two ears, but they do not bear two stories.
Nobody shows heaven to a child.
The eyes of a stranger may be very large, but be does not see the inner things of tbe town.
A gun does not burst in Europe and wound people in Ga.
A blanket is not made into a knot.
The partridge is not greater than the planter.
The head does not sit down and the knee put on a hat.
The mother of the goat is looked at if the kid is bought.
The Dun does not beget the Yo.
An old broom is better than a new one.
An elephant does not eat small berries.
Monday does not come one Monday only.
A person does not sit or exist whilst they take a tree to witness.
A river moves a river on.
If thou put a stick into a hole and dost not see what is in, if thou put thy hand in thou knowest what it is.
If something is carried on the head and thou seest it not, if it be put down thou seest it.
With the Ho's long tail the Ho is bound.
The hand does not deceive one.
A bad person is better than an empty house.
People eat not without him that saith "it is good."
If thou lmowest not what is behind thy neighbour's back, thou dost not venture a sheep for him.
A thorn is not a long piece of wood that two persons may sit upon it.
To precede a man is not to leave him.
There is no cabbage, therefore people eat herbs.
If thou pound palm nuts, some will stain thy cloth.
A stick that goes into fire will begin to burn.
About a sweet fish there is danger.
Nobody makes a falling place his sleeping-place.
The mouth does not know that its master is afraid.
No man puts new cloth into an old garment.
No sleep, no dream.
It is one thing to look, it is another to look here.
The left hand remains not quiet, when a dead body strikes at one.
Whom hunger ate and he died, people enquire not after his box..
Had Odomirifa aught to eat, he would not dig for crabs.
Nobody sees a stick and rubs his eyes at it.
To warn a man is not to scold him.
The back does not bear a word.
If thou wash a king, thou washest thyself with some of his soap.
Nobody vies with the Asamanukpa in stone-throwing.
Hate has no medicine.
Where the sheep likes, there it places its white.
Nobody sees as Opale sees.
The Hienmalo is absent, so they play with his cubs.
No one makes a knot and leaves his thumb.
A wife is like a giant.
He who makes a knot, knows to loose it.
Different one man's head, different the others.
The way after Ga, that is the way.
I thatch for you a house, you hide my strings.
A child does not break a land tortoise, but a child knows how to break a snail.
When thou pressest a friend of thine, thy friend also presseth thee.
Ohwam, if thou go and see that the leaves have covered the palm-tree, remove them, for by-and-by, when the nuts are ripe, thou will eat some.
What has not come before, is behind, the sea.
Nobody sees the giant slave of another and jumps for joy.
If in length there were aught, the serpent would have something to eat.
He has no cloth and calls for a woman.
A blind man does not play in the dust.
To brag is not to plant bananas: in clearing the ground about them, it consists.
Do people dwell in a town where there is no warm food?
Nobody cooks food and puts it on the dust-hill, to seek his relatives that they may eat.
If thou teach a brute stick-chewing, even if it sleeps, it sticks in its mouth.
The Kokote soup is poured out— should I regard the sovereign?
No sooner had the Okukuba said his tail was long, then the weasel boasted.
A tree which has no fork, its ascent is difficult.
It will get dark and a sleeping-place will be found.
A young crocodile does not die in the river.
If thou huskest corn with the fowl, it will not esteem thee.
Nobody intending to cast a stone at one, takes up a clod and shows it to him.
One is full, the other is hungry; to whom do people sell?
He who works for thee, does not go with an empty belly.
The European pigeon says, "He who eats and gives to thee, for him thou quenchest the fire."
No one takes a bill-hook and cuts an axe with it.
Soup is sweet to an animal, but the animal has no hand to take it up with.
If a thief say he knows how to steal, let him steal a cannon.
No one puts down five for ten.
If thou care to Kill the fly, thou wilt hurt thy boil.
Thou hatest meat, and —thou eatest liver!
If it were for the land-tortoise's sake, no gun would be fired.
A cabbage-dealer has never sold mere leaves.
The potter eats out of a potsherd.
If thou art in a vessel thou takest out the water..
Thou art not on it when people go upon it, therefore thou saidst "the sea is calm."
If the elephant say he is thin, he has not only one tray full.
A stranger does not divide Ko-meat.
A Ga family is like crocodile's fat, if thou anoint thy self with it thy skin cracks.
A father-child says it is night, but a mother-child says it is not night.
Kwaw Mensa once wished to go to Fete; it was different when he was sent to Cape Coast.
If thou wish for palm-nuts, go to Tutu.
No one shows the way to his town with the left hand.
A cow-herd does not fear a cow.
A dog does not bite a dog till blood comes out.
A fowl that is not good, with spices it goes.
A hunter knows not sick game, therefore he shoots it.
A bird which does not get feathers, quickly it learns to fly.
Little by little a fly eats a dog's ear.
If an animal say it be very fat, it does not rival the pig.
Earth and heaven do not come together.
The days of poverty are more than the days of superfluity.
Thou wilt serve seventeen masters.
The day when the pig will be caught, the wild boar will lead the way.
If the land-tortoise would say it is for hardness' sake, people would take up pads upon this earth.
The soup of the Ashante is tasteful, but there is too much salt in it.
He is as hard as a crocodile.
He is as hungry as a hyaena.
Nobody buys yams in the ground.
A child builds a second story and an old man dwells down-stairs.
I am a Tantra fish: in the market I bear.
A cat is not sold in a bag, but openly produced.
If people would eat Koko raw, they would eat it so behind the bush
The snail says, for his sake no gun would go into the bush.
A spider does not sit, that people may teach it to speak through the nose.
If food be in the bouse, people do not say, "Yams shall be stolen and brought."
A hyaena does not drive a cow.
If a wag says it is very long, it does not pass the town.
Dede is a fool, but she says it is Kokon.
The cockroach seems to die but does not die.
The foot of a fowl does not kill its chicken.
An elder hearkens not to the the gossip of town.
If thy knife cut thee thou sheathest it.
Thine enemy saith, "Thou wishest my death."
In the morning the mouth hath an evil savour, but a good word comes out of it.
A rich man composes every dance, but he has never composed a dance of weeping.
If thou many a harlot, thou dost not wax wroth at what may happen.
For the evil that exists in the world it is, that thy child when born is instructed.
If thou wear a cloth that fits thee not it happens that thou art called an executioner.
A debtor does not get angry.
The moon does not appear one day only and cease to shine.
If thou art weak, thou sayest the pad is not good.
"It is nothing!"— but that is something.
If the wild boar say it is not his foot-print, still it is it.
Nobody is twice a fool.
He cut a tree, and fell over it himself.
Nobody is twice ashamed.
He who has wine says it is good.
If stretching were wealth, the cat would be rich.
One head does not go a-counselling.
On account of the poverty that affects the Akwamu man, he calls himself a man of Ayigbe.
If thou drive a beast and give it no way, it turns upon thee.
What the children do at the ends of the town, that the elders do in the town.
Nobody wars with ghosts.
Somebody's hand is not thy hand.
What is not eaten is not cooked.
If ther were no elephant in the jungle, the buffalo would be a great animal.
Saith the liar, "My witness is in Europe"
To send some one up and to draw away the ladder from under him.
Dry bread is not good eating.
Something has bitten the serpent!
The monkey saith, "My eye is my fetish".
People say " one " before they say " two."
It is the ear that troubles the mouth.
Mouth not keeping to mouth, and lip not keeping to lip, bring trouble to the jaws.
A wise man, who knows proverbs, reconciles difficulties.
By labour comes wealth.
A grass mat does not last like a bulrush mat : a grass mat will not bend; it breaks to pieces.
It will not do to reveal one's secrets to a tattler.
The stocks are not fastened on the foot of one, except of him who does evil.
The marsh stands aloof, as if it were not akin to the stream.
When the day dawns the trader betakes himself to his trade; the spinner takes her spindle.
The warrior takes his shield; the weaver bends over his sley
The farmer awakes, he and his hoe-handle.
When the Imale is not hungry, he says, " I never eat monkey-flesh."
One never carries elephant's flesh on his head that he may dig in the ground with his foot for crickets.
A long time may pass before one is caught in a lie.
The slanderer brings disgrace on one, like a leprosy which attacks one on the point of the nose.
He is a helper that helps no more.
A large cock decides for us in the midst of the night.
The first-born is the shepherd's.
Although, the bath-room is in the house, it is as wet as a garden by the water side.
On various plans bits are made; one by one we learn the characters of men:
the character of a man being known, if it were given thee as a present, thou wouldst not desire it; it is painful to one as a calamity.
With dancing and joy moves the maggot; wriggling about to and fro moves the worm.
they dance, they rejoice; but the child of the Banabana is going to the wood farm.
We do not look for a man clad in white cloth in the quarters of the palm-oil maker.
Covetousness is the father of unsatisfied desires.
The ologbo is the father of traditionists.
The rat says he knows every day; but he does not know another day
A strong man who is destitute of forethought is the father of laziness.
One who does not understand the yellow palm-bird says the yellow palm-bird is noisy
The Lord of Heaven has created us with different natures.
If a great man should wrong you, smile upon him.
The butcher has no regard for the breed of the beast
The forest is dark, and the night is dark: the darkness of the night will soon conquer that of the forest.
Except a sloven, who is wont to rise in the morning without washing his face nicely?
The tongs are at the head of the blacksmith's shop.
The osho or tattoo-painting of the Buje- woman lasts not nine days; the tattooing of the Inabi-woman lasts not a year.
If a dog has a man to back him he will kill a baboon.
A heedless dog will not do for the chase.
If a man let fall his Gagalo a hand will be stretched out to seize them.
We should not undertake a thing which we cannot lift.
Though the host may be living on wild beans, the guest expects a handful of boiled corn.
Trust not to an inheritance; the produce of one's hands is sufficient for one.
He who waits for chance may wait a year.
We should fear him who sends us with a message, not him to whom we are sent.
You may say the blow is very light—you do not reflect that it hurts the snail.
When the spear sees the battle, it dances ; when the lance sees the battle, it joys.
An affair which we conduct with gentleness is not marred; an affair which we conduct with violence causes us vexation.
When the wild cat becomes a leopard, it will devour large beasts.
Frowning and fierceness prove not manliness.
A large stone (being thrown) crushed a lizard. It said "So he who is stronger than one treats one."
When the spider would attack thee, it extends its web to entangle thee.
A self-willed man soon has disgrace.
The locust will eat, the locust will drink, the locust will go; where shall the grasshopper hide ?
No female snuff-dealer sells stale snuff ; they all sell the best
The buyer does not consider the seasons ; be thinks, perhaps, yams grow as big as logs.
If one ornament an old wall, it is not improved ; if he do anything for wood, it is adapted to the wood.
Disobedience will drink water with his hand tied to his neck.
A parasite has no root ; every tree is its kindred.
A slave is not the child of a tree: if a slave dies, his mother does not hear of it; if a free-born child dies, lamentation is made: yet the slave too was once a child in his mother's house.
The bill-hook clears the farm, but receives no profit from the farm; the bill-hook clears the road, but receives no profit from the road.
the bill-hook is badly broken, the bill-hook is badly bent; the bill-hook breaks, it pays five cowries to gird its handle with a ring; it reaches its owner's farm; when the bill-hook has a new ring on its neck, it is girded tightly.
One birth does not differ from another birth ; as the slave was born, so was the free-born child.
One should never laugh at a sick person; perhaps what afflicts him to-day may afflict thee tomorrow.
Thou art the superintendent in the master's absence; look well to the house !
When the farmer is tying up corn-sheaves he rejoices; from bundles of corn come bundles of money.
A contemptuous action should not be done to our fellow-man.
Patching makes a garment last long; one who does not attend to patching will come to want clothes.
As one is sent on a message, so he should deliver it; if thou add anything to it, it is on thine own responsibility.
The bat hangs with its head down, watching the actions of all birds.
He enjoys the world more than the owner of the world.
The slander of the ground-nut against the white field-pea falls upon itself: he who is in the wrong must sit quietly apart.
He who injures another, injures himself.
A guest who is no advantage to a person is selfish ; he who eats the sweet should also eat the sour
It is a shakey wall; we push against it, and finding that it does not fall we make friends with it 
A pleader wards off death, a pleader wards off a difficulty; if the heat is severe, a fan mitigates it.
When famine is sharp, the cricket is fat; when famine is relieved, the cricket is poor.
The rain beats "shoe-drum, shoe-drum" on the rock in the yard of the chief drummer, the drum is wood, and the shoe is leather.
A crow fought with, a crow, a crow conquered a crow.—once!
As smacking of the lips precedes weeping, so mortification follows a difficulty; the whole population of the town assemble, but cannot find a sacrifice against mortification.
The thread follows the needle.
A job done for one's self is not the day's work; the master's work claims the chief part of one's time.
He that forgives gains the victory in the dispute.
If God should compute our sins, we should perish.
Compare thing with thing, compare matter with matter : and then forgive that thou mayest be praised.
If a needle fall from a leper's hand, it requires consideration; if a difficult matter come upon the country, it requires thought
It is like the genealogy of the Esuo, who said his grandmother was an Ekulu.
The pig, having done wallowing in the mire, is seeking some clean person to rub against.
A suspicious character immediately salutes the owner of the house.
The sword does not know the head of the blacksmith who made it.
The calabash having saved them in time of famine, they said, " Let us cut it for a drinking cup."
We meet with guests who are like the lower jaw; if one die in the morning, it separates in the evening.
Money, the elevator, he leaves the foremost to deal favourably with the hindmost.
The witch, child of envy—my troubles are sore and hard—she kills but cannot inherit.
The man who has bread to eat does not appreciate the severity of a famine.
The axe which cuts the tree is not afraid ; but the woodman makes a sacrifice to his head.
A bribe blinds the judge, for a bribe cannot give a true judgment
If there remain to-day or to-morrow before the iguana will die of thirst, rain will surely fall.
Leave the battle to God, and rest your head upon your hand
By its beauty the butterfly praises Grod within and without
Behind and before the butterfly praises God , though it crumbles into dust like a cinder.
Open the cask of rum, open the keg of powder; he that is sent with it dares not open the cask.
the god of blacksmiths and soldiers does not work ivory, the blacksmith does not work leather ; if the farm were not hard to till, the blacksmith would not make hoes for sale.
He fled from the sword, and hid in the scabbard.
We see that one knows how to speak about the faults of others, although he covers his own with a potsherd.
We cannot prevent a baboon squatting because it is his nature; he cannot take from a man his homestead
The perpetrator of a secret crime supposes it is be they are talking about; his face being pale as one who has done something wrong.
A whisperer watches the bush; a bush never tells secrets ; he to whom one speaks is the traitor.
The river is never so full as to obscure the sight of the fish.
A great affair Covers up a small matter.
By the staff of Egugun! the tree fell and startled the farmer.
The sacrifice in the basket
When a relative dies at a distance, a small fragment of his remains is brought home.
The eagle is the father of birds of prey.
Heaven and earth, two large calabashes, shut not to be open.
The deaf look surprised on people's mouths
The owner of copper ornaments looks for a lemon, the owner of brass looks for "Awede."
My hands and feet are shaken
Fire is an inmate which cannot be tamed.
An accident is not like an expected result.
A white cloth and a stain never agree.
If the matter be dark, dive to the bottom.
What is not wished to be known, is done in secrecy.
Wrapping up a razor preserves its sharpness.
He who begs with importunity will get what he wants.
Each coloured cloth has its name.
He who does not love his neighbour acts maliciously.
If clothes remain long in the bag they rot.
He who knows a matter beforehand confounds the liar.
If a bush is surrounded the animals in it are easily killed.
A hunchback is never asked to stand upright.
The young cannot teach tradition to the old.
There is no market in which the dove with the prominent breast has not traded.
Let the white pigeon tell the woodpecker, and bird tell bird.
Though many guests are absent, only he who enlivens the party is missed.
He who disappoints another is unworthy to be trusted.
He who torments another teaches him to strengthen himself.
Contraction of words conceals the sense.
We wake and find marks on the palms of our hand ; we do not know who made the marks : we wake and find an old debt, and we know not who incurred it.
The King has no cap, but a crown.
He who causes one's starvation is not one's friend.
A waterfowl is not fit to worship the tutelary god Ipori.
The fowl is the forerunner of the dead.
Whoever kills an Afe-imojo must bear it to Oyo; the Eda only is due to the people of the province to eat.
Chaff is to be fanned away.
The faithless man receives your words in a perforated vessel, but keeps behind his back the vessel which would retain them, or turns his back instead of his face.
What the blind saw before he was blind, is the last sight he ever shall see.
One lock does not know the wards of another.
An Agbada torn at the neck is spoiled.
Indian corn is the true support of a people.
A mere skull has no brains in it.
A boulder is the father of rocks.
You must help an idle man thoroughly if you would help him at all.
As a calabash receives the sediment of water, so an elder must exercise forbearance.
When one is carrying water and happens to spill it, if the calabash be not broken, you can get more.
The Agbe is the dyer in blue; the Aluko is the painter of red dye, but the Lekeleke is the owner of the white cloth (i.e., is white).
You met a hen in the market, and hastened to purchase her; had she been worth keeping the owner would not have sold her.
The squash is never bitter in a large family.
Two rams cannot drink out of the same calabash.
A ram's mane gives him a noble appearance; a father's honour makes a son proud.
the cocoa tree, and its nut is not good for a bird to eat.
Self-conceit deprives the wasp of honey
When the face is washed, you finish at the chin.
No one will throw away venison for squirrel's flesh.
He is going on calling you, and you pretend to be deaf.
An implacable person is always a source of trouble, a pliable person is sure to suffer.
"Rags make up a pad : " there is a town called " RagTown."
The wise rat is caught in a trap : how much more the stupid rat?
There is no tallness among pigeons : they are all dwarfs.
The dog which is known to be very swift is set to catch the hare.
If one is not able at once to build a house, a shed is first erected.
Venus travels with the moon; they suppose it to be her dog: venus is not the moon's dog.
The farmhouse remains to the last and the ridge of the roof completes the building.
The tongue is the end of the mouth.
Disobedience is the father of insolence.
If the stomach be not strong, do not eat cockroaches,
The world is an ocean: mankind is the Ossa Lagoon: however well a person swims, he cannot cross the world.
A dog valued at half-a-crown cannot be taught.
An old dog must be sacrificed to Ogun.
A stupid dog will not do for the chase.
The Iwe is sure to slip from the farmer's hands.
A basket with its bottom burst is useless.
He who tries to shake the trunk of a tree, only shakes himself.
When a grave is made, there is a great deal of noise; and the sight of a vault makes old men tremble.
He who kills an Ajako is sure to suffer for it.
The enemy pulls down the fortifications.
It is easy to cut to pieces a dead elephant ; but no one dares attack a live one.
The bat is neither rat nor bird
May a future resurrection answer my hopes!
Houses not contiguous do not easily catch fire.
With the mouth the partridge proclaims it's fat, crying "Nothing but fat! nothing but fat!"
You are bashful like the armadillo.
The vulture scents the carcase, however high in the air he may be.
He is not angry on account of slaves, nor peevish on account of children.
Whenever he hears of my war, he never waits to make provision.
Akashu is the father of other loaves.
A cross bow is not enough to go to war with: whom do you dare to face with a stick ?
A cross-bowman is obliged to look upwards.
The public crier does not eat warm food.
A scorpion stings with his tail ; a domestic is apt to be insolent ; one cannot hide a scorpion in the hand.
A small bed will not hold two persons.
One cannot bless the gods without using the word "Akishalle."
Rags disgrace a handsome person.
You may see but not dare to speak: it is that which is the death of the strong man.
The singer has no one to take part in the chorus with him.
The heart of the Ashakpa tree fears no axe.
A near neighbour need not take a final leave till tomorrow.
Peace is the father of friendship.
A beggar never dies of want in the capital.
A petty trader has no flesh upon her bosom.
He who has only his eyebrow for a cross-bow can never kill an animal.
A noisy weaver, who imitates his master weaver
A white cloth is an object of hatred to the gods.
An elder brother is a resemblance to a father.
The stirrup is the father of the saddle.
When fire bums up the bush, it respects the Aluki plant.
The coming year is not out of sight ; let us be up and work.
A lame man said his load was not upright, and was answered, "It's unevenness began from the ground
The Amgbadu is the sauce of messengers.
The Antete cricket causes a stir and confusion.
If a child treats the mahogany tree insolently, it wounds his head; if he treats the Iroko tree civilly, it welcomes him.
Nothing but a potsherd can face fire.
The executioner never lets the sword be passed across his own neck.
A bald-headed man does not care for a razor.
When a shield sees death, it turns its outside to meet it.
The artisan always follows a pattern.
The pin says to the cotton, "Do not hang jour trouble on my neck."
By degrees one understands a sign
A rascal never closes the mouth of his bag.
The injury of a bag is caused by the injury of the pack-rope; if the pack-rope breaks, the bag will go down.
A large cotton tree receives the heft and axe together.
When the Agballe is overpowered, there remains only the power of the Arabi
Mankind presents a circumscribed countenance
Velvet gives a finish to dress.
He who marries a beauty marries trouble.
Though the pap is cold on the back, yet the inside is very hot.
The man with withered limb is the porter at the gate to the gods.
The matter is to you what the task of kneeling is to one of withered limbs.
The Aro does not always bear its load: it will be put down sooner or later.
A fool of Ika town and an idiot of Iluka town meet together to make friendship with each other.
Wrangling is the father of fighting.
The hawk having caught my chicken will not stay, because it knows it has done wrong.
Words selected in a dispute always appear right.
The dog playing with the young hedgehog, does not suffer it to be wise
Another's eye is not like one's own : agents are not numerous.
A pistol has not a bore like a cannon: a poor man has not money at his command like the rich.
He who claps his hands for the fool to dance, is no better than the fool.
The monkey's grandmother was a fool.
The Asorin is the father of trees.
Asorin trees never form a grove.
The Asorin tree commands the brook.
Cloth has hands but no fingers : so a man but no flowing train
Fearless of death, the pigeon feeds among the hawks
When the bush is on fire, the pigeon removes from the grass-field: when the flame is extinguished, every one returns to his home.
The thumb cannot point straight forwards.
Continual sweepings make a high rubbish-heap.
Bird-lime is the death of a bird.
The sole of the foot is exposed to all the dirt of the road.
The palm of the hand never deceives one.
An old story does not open the ear as a new one does.
May God give us a happy end !
As the Ife people speak without disguise, so a poisoned arrow kills an animal in the sight of all.
If you abuse the Etta you make the Awo's head ache.
When the hawk hovers over the yard, the owner of the fowls feels uneasy.
No one would expose fowls on the top of a rock in the sight of a hawk.
The Awodi has eyes that can bear the fire.
Says mocking-bird I sing 200 songs in the morning, 200 at noon, and 200 in the afternoon, besides many frolicsome notes for my own amusement
However well an image be made, it must stand upon something.
The blood of the land-tortoise is not a handfull.
One may call at the house of the generous and be filled : who will call at the house of a miser and salute him ?
The house of the land-tortoise is not large enough for itself ; the verandah will not accommodate a guest.
When a monkey jumps down from the tree, he jumps into the house
The Ayan-tree resists an axe.
When the Ayo-game is won, it cannot be disputed.
I saw the departure, but not the return.
To be busy here and there, like the messenger of the ant
A great matter puts a smaller out of sight.
When there are no elders, the town is ruined; when the master dies, the house is desolate.
The war drum is destitute of bells
With shoes one can get on in the midst of thorns.
Beg for help, and you will meet with rebuff : ask for alms, and you will meet with misers.
A thing which cannot be lifted should never be undertaken.
The Gudugudu is very acid at the root.
If is the king who receives custom.
Eh ! The grass field which grew up last year is burnt up.
One day's rain makes up for many days' drought.
He is an enemy who slanders one's name.
Much talking is unbecoming in an elder.
Respect the elders: they are our fathers.
The younger should not intrude into the seat of the elders.
The grub becomes a butterfly.
The sore is spreading ; the fire is glowing ; the throat is hoarse.
Though you seem very clever, you cannot tell 9 times 9.
Though a small covered dish gives the stew a neat appearance, a bowl answers best for great men.
To prostrate oneself and keep the elbows close, does something for one.
Do not receive a slander against any one to accuse him falsely.
He to whom kindness is shown and does not return thanks, if evil is done to him he will not feel that either.
Hunger does not allow saving of money: hunger makes the body lean.
The good which Agbe did in Offa town is wasted.
A tick having fastened itself on the mouth of a fox, a fowl was desired to remove it; but the fowl well knew that she was food for the fox, as well as the tick was food for her.
The hare said, "I care for nobody but the archer. "
However much a snake may try, no one will be friendly to that child of writhing : on the contrary, all mankind will take up sticks to strike it.
As anything which a man is doing is natural to him, so a lie is natural to a liar.
The name given to a child becomes natural to it.
Three elders cannot all fail to pronounce Ekulu: one may say Ekulu, another Ekulu, but the third will say Ekulu.
A stranger, like the ground-pig, is entertained with palm -nuts.
To be trodden upon here, to be trodden upon there, is the fate of the palm-nut in the road.
He chokes me, like Ekuru.
The elephant makes a dust, and the buffalo makes a dust, but the dust of the buffalo is lost in that of the elephant.
The house-rat does not show its companion the hole in the ceiling
The domestic rat has no voice to call the cat to account.
As the Elubo was once a soft unripe yam, so the slave was once a child in his father's house.
The sting of the sand-fly is not so sharp as poverty.
Let the wonder stop at Ibese, and not proceed to Ijanna.
If you have no money to give to one in distress, you may pay frequent visits; if you cannot visit, you may send good words of the mouth
One here, two there, so the market is filled up.
One here, two there, so gathers a vast multitude.
If the elephant can be angry, so can the ant.
He who cannot raise an ant, and yet tries to raise an elephant, shall find out his folly.
The trader never confesses that he has sold all his goods ; but when asked, he will only say, " Trade is a little better."
Ashes fly back in the face of him that throws them
Order is the order of the Ika, multitude is the multitude of the Erun.
Famine compels one to eat the fruit of all kinds of trees.
The fly heeds not death : eating is all to him.
As the rejected one has no kindness of disposition, his house is made for him in the street by itself.
The white ant may well admire the bird, for after flying one day it loses its wings.
There is nothing so numerous as the locusts : they meet you in the town and in the field.
Consideration is the first born, calculation the next, wisdom the third.
Want of consideration and forethought made six brothers pawn themselves for six dollars.
Ear, hear the other side of the question before you decide.
When the goat has fed, it returns home ; when the sheep has fed, it returns home ; not returning home after feeding ruins the pig.
Sacrifice was prescribed to the turkey-buzzard, but it refused to offer it; sacrifice was prescribed to the vulture, but it also refused: when sacrifices were prescribed to the pigeon, it offered them.
You have not yet obtained the loaf, and you began to prepare your stew.
Because friendship is pleasant, we partake of our friend's entertainment; not because we have not enough in our own house.
A man may be as strong as the buffalo, yet he has no horns.
The Egge-trap never fails, whatever comes under it is struck dead.
He who is pierced with thorns must limp off to him who has a lancet
A man does not run among thorns for nothing ; either he is chasing a snake or a snake is chasing him.
He runs into debt who cuts up a pigeon to sell it in parts.
it was the death of the fish that introduced it into town; what else would  gave brought it from the to the palace ?
Every thing has its price ; but who can set a price upon blood ? Blood does not willingly leave the body.
If the poor man's rafter does not reach the top in the morning, it will reach it in the evening.
It is difficult to encompass a leopard.
A wild boar, in place of a pig, would ravage the town; and a slave, made king, would spare nobody.
A witness speaks the truth ; a witness does not take the liars part.
The influence of a fountain makes the brook flow.
When a joke is uttered it creates laughter : when one has eaten to the full, he falls a-dozing.
What is really a load should not be called an ornament
The jaw is the house of laughter.
I have tied the leopard skin round my waist : you cannot sell me.
Familiarity breeds contempt : distance secures respect.
The Fula are a tribe from over the sea
The egg becomes a cock.
You cannot shave a man's head in his absence.
The Okete says, "I understand what you mean by a specified day, but another day I do not understand."
A man walks at his ease in the presence of his abuser;a man steps proudly in the presence of his abuser; when he knows that the abuser has not twenty cowries in his house.
Silver is the father of lead ; gold is the father of brass.
If they do not want you in their company, go aside.
The spoon seeing death, ventures its head into it
I present my fear to the elders in general; I present my respects to the whole town; I present my respects to all the leading elders of Oyo.
We cannot dwell in a house together without speaking one to another.
He who boasts much can do very little.
As one is walking, so is he met.
He is as suspicious as the seller of the herb Tette.
Do not lay hold of a man who has a drawn knife.
The house-rat said, "I do not feel so much offended with the man who killed me, as with him who dashed me on the ground afterwards."
A delicate thing is not difficult to be injured.
When a tree is cut in the forest, the echo repeats the sound.
The priest who is more crafty than another, induces him to adopt the worship of Ifa.
The wild yam will not do to be made into flour.
The badness of the yam is the badness of the knife: but it is soon found out that the yam is in fault; so he who injures another injures himself.
He is as stubborn as a mule.
The Salala is the father of aprons.
Inquiry saves a man from mistakes. He who makes no inquiry, gets himself into trouble.
He encumbers himself like the papaw
He who has done you a kindness should never be ill-used.
Anger does nobody good: patience is the father of dispositions. Anger draws arrows from the quiver: good words draw Kola nuts from the bag.
A gun is not so hard to buy as powder: a gun is bought one day—powder must be bought again and again. Without powder a gun is nothing but a rod.
Along shore you must navigate the ocean: down channel you must navigate the Ossa: where you please you may navigate the Oyan.
May the increase of the house and the increase of the market befall you!
The eagle'is the prince of fowls: the eagle is the prince of birds of prey.
Tell me the rump of it
Inordinate gain makes a hole in the pocket.
The Ife is noted by its flight as the bravest of birds.
The potsherd goes in front of him who has taken the fire from the hearth with it.
A calabash may be cut into halves, but not an earthen pot.
He who gathers Igba-fruit spends the money of death
The spoon is liberal, the pap-seller is not: the spoon would have given plenty, the stingy pap-seller would not let it.
Ordinary people are as common as grass, but good people are dearer than an eye.
Had the snail not known where to feed in safety, it would never have grown so large as to be worth twenty cowries.
When the snail crawls, its shell accompanies it.
As the tortoise meets with due regard, so should the snail.
May you eat old age and longevity.
The Igbo searches the nests of other birds to plunder them
When the skin is not hurt, it says that it has no flesh
Piercing me with a lance is not like pricking me with a thorn.
The pounding of Iyan is not like the pounding of Elubo: Iyan becomes more adhesive, Elubo separates into powder.
I have no room to go into the house, because of the crowd.
Poverty destroys a man's reputation.
News is interesting from the mouth of him who tells it first.
The noise of the river drowns the noise of the people.
He who runs about the fields is in danger of falling into a pit.
Day and night the nostril is always at work: when it stops life is at an end.
Every one in the assembly has a name; but when you are summoned "in the name of the assembly" evil awaits you
Strife never begets a gentle child.
We had no shea-butter nuts to gather: we were obliged to seek about to pick up the remnants eaten by the bats.
When we compete in working, our hands quicken
The public assembly belongs to the town: a select council belongs to the king.
The wicked man would not treat his own child as he treats others.
The white ants are destroying a house: the old man who owns it complains. The old man himself will soon be the white ants' food
An unlucky man should never go to gather the Ikan: He will surely bring home the Ila instead.
Be not in too great a hurry to enjoy the world: you have life enough before you yet.
Whoso owns the inner square, owns the outer.
You are always eating Kola-nuts. Are you an Ikki?
When the rain beat upon the parrot, the woodpecker rejoiced, thinking that his rival's red tail was spoiled; but the rain only increased its beauty.
As carrying dust is forbidden in Ife, so no dog dares to bark near the leopard's lair.
The strength of a wooden mortar is not like the strength of an earthen pot. Place a mortar on the fire, and it will burn; pound a yam in a pot, and it will break through
A man with a cough cannot conceal himself.
A corner in the world of sense is better than a corner in the world of spirits.
When your neighbour's horse falls into a pit, you should not rejoice at it, for your own child may fall into it too.
The belly is the father of the gods.
The Okro which was so celebrated, does notvbear fruit; the pumpkin, which was so celebrated, does not trail: the beloved child, of whom I expected so much, does not answer my hopes.
A peace-maker often receives wounds.
Iwo is the abode of the parrot, Ibara is the land of the hawk, but where is the territory of the green parrot?
Frogs' spawn attracts not the robber's eye.
One must go through the porch before entering the square.
When you are warned, warn yourself.
Arrows for the wild boar must be made to order: a common poisoned arrow will not kill that savage
Any one may practise His Moslem worship as it is most convenient: he may breakfast off a pig's foot.
Covenant makers should not deceive one another; for one man's counsel is not sufficient.
A man of fashion eats the Iwo, a wise man the Kola nut ; a man of vulgar tastes eats the Ahusa.
Though the glow-worm never kindles a fire, yet it travels with glowing fire at its tail.
Though the fire is burning, the walls do not shrink from it, and yet the fire is trying to consume the water.
The white man is the father of merchants: want of money is the father of disgrace.
No one should ask the fish what happens in the plain; nor should the rat be asked what takes place in the water.
The ipeta is the bachelor's soap.
Twinkling, twinkling, twinkling stars, like so many chickens behind the moon.
What good have the gods done to the hunchback, that he should name his child Orisagbemi?
The sugar-cane has a better quality than the bulrush: there are not many plants which can supply the mouth with such sap.
To-day is the elder brother of to-morrow, and a copious dew is the elder brother of the rain.
The Iro was presented to us as something which might readily be swallowed, and, instead of that, it chokes us.
Perseverance is everything.
The horse's tail soon becomes the man s tail ; for when the horse dies he leaves his tail behind him.
Plenty of Iru does not spoil the stew.
A fugitive never stops to pick the thorns from his foot; the fugitive makes no choice of his sauce.
No one should draw water from the spring to feed the abyss.
The pot-lid is always badly off: the pot gets all the sweet, the lid nothing but steam.
Wherever a man goes to dwell, his character goes with him.
Poverty never visits a husband without visiting his children: a poor man has no relatives.
The labourer is always in the sun: the landowner is always in the shade.
The evil-doer is ever anxious.
The junction of the road does not dread sacrifices.
A round of seventeen days is the meeting of the Egbas.
Unless the tree falls, one will never get at the branches.
If you are modest, you are modest to your own advantage.
Every man's character is good in bis own eyes.
The appearance of the wise differs from that of the fool.
Calamity has no voice: suffering cannot speak to tell who is really in distress
The hawks go away for the moulting season, and the ignorant suppose that these birds are gone for ever.
He was guilty in the matter and then sat in a corner.
If you attend to what is roasting, it will not be burnt.
"You say we should not shoot arrows; with what,then, shall we repel the enemy?" Twas with a sling that one of old repelled the Boko people, replied the other.
The crow was going to Ibara ; a breeze sprung up behind: "That will help me on famously," quoth the crow.
One man makes bill-hooks to put into the hands of others.
Rock-salt- is the produce of Haussa; tobacco is the produce of the European; the spoon is the produce of the chief of Ire.
The gnats have no quarrel with the calabash
The voice of the Kegio does not reach the sky.
A large cock does not suffer a small one to crow.
He indulges the child as if it were an eye.
The printed pattern of the calico deceives the country cloth; the calico is not in reality what the country cloth takes it to be; for whilst the fact of its being dyed makes it seem coarse, the thread is fine
Do not play me the trick by which the fool gets a rope round his neck.
Whoso does not salute on returning from a journey, forfeits the salutation offered to him who has remained at home.
We may talk this and talk that, it is because we do not understand one another.
The lion is the pet of the forest: let every beast take heed how he feeds, for the lion does not eat stale meat.When he roars, he says, "Except the elephant, except man, except the black thing, I fear nobody."
As the grubs eating the Iwo, and the grubs eating the Obi, lodge within the Iwo and the Obi; so he that betrays you is not far from your person.
As the envious man has nothing, so grass matting is unfit for trowsers.
As no subject, however rich, may possess a herald, so it is not every man that may possess a palace.
The king regards rebels with an evil eye.
When the fox dies, the fowls never mourn; for the fox never rears a chicken.
The sieve never sifts flour by itself
"I am perishing!" cries the hare in the field "I am a spendthrift!" is the cry of the partridge on the barn-top.
The dawn cometh not twice to wake a man: the dawn is the earliest part of the day; with the evening twilight comes the night.
Patience is the best of dispositions : he who possesses patience, possesses all things.
When a fish is killed, its tail is inserted into its own mouth.
When fire burns in the fields, the flakes fly to the town.
The keen heat of the sun is not like the keenness of a razor.
Marrow is the father of blood.
The drunkard cannot drink a hole in a calabash, though he may drink so as to forget his trouble.
You must attend to your business with the vendor in the market, and not to the noise of the market.
A man may be born to a heritage, but wisdom comes only with length of days.
A child cannot be lost like a beast.
earth salt is not to be compared with real salt.
If you cannot obtain a large bat for sacrifice, a small one will do instead.
If the mind is not malicious, some one will be malicious against him.
The stream may dry up, but the water-course retains its name.
He who enters a ruin may fear, but the ruin fears not.
The pestle and the mortar had no quarrel between them, it was the farmer that caused the quarrel: the child of the mortar does not beat its mother for nothing.
If you are going to die, need you split up the mortar for firewood ?
The Odu herb is not unknown to the farmer.
Sacrifice being prescribed to the parrot, be refused to offer it, but the green parrot took the sacrifice and offered it; after all, the parrot is a citizen of the capital, and the green parrot is an inhabitant of the province: and yet people thought that the parrot was not wise.
Heaven and earth are two large calabashes, which, being shut, can never be opened.
A tale-bearer receives not 2000 cowries; thanks are all his reward. Tale-bearing is the elder brother; bitterness is the younger.
It was the squirrel's own mouth that betrayed her; for when she had brought forth two young ones, she carried them to the roadside, and said, "My children are very sound, very sound, very sound !"
One cannot lean upon emptiness.
There is no medicine against old age.
When the Ogboya strikes its tail thrice on the ground in any town, that town will be deserted.
The headlong fall of a liar is not concealed, but is exposed to view.
When a man becomes an old bachelor, he makes his own fire-place
The Ogidigbo is the best of all drums; the Ogidigbo has a meaning in its sound: he who understands the sound can dance to it—"May you be old, King Ajagbo! may you be old, may the king be old, may I also be old !"
Boasting at home is not valour, parade is not battle: when war is seen, the valiant will be known.
The ostrich is the father of birds.
As a street-quarrel will prove fatal to a bashful man, so will war
kill a man renowned for valour.
Bank rises after bank, and ditch follows ditch: when the rain falls into the ditch, the banks are envious.
A jealous woman has no flesh upon her breast; for, however much she may feed upon jealousy, she will never have enough.
The eye is the father of the body: as the eye is too dear to be purchased, so it is hard to act well an elder's part.
The leg makes the brook resound.
When the day dawns, you rejoice: do you not know that the day of death is so much the nearer?
As the grass cannot grow in the sky, so the dead can not look out of the grave into the road.
A large morsel chokes a child.
A store of food is the best equipment for war: when war is proclaimed, every man takes up his wallet.
The fame of the white man spreads throughout the world.
We all agreed to value the rat at 140 cowries: when 20 cowries are to be added, it must be by common consent.
It comes to the knot
A multitude of warriors behind their leader is like a flock of palm-birds.
Do you not first strike the giant in the night, before you strike him in the day?
When water is poured upon the head, it will find its way down to the feet.
Competition and reward induce a child to work.
"To-day I am going! to-morrow I am going!" gives the stranger no encouragement to plant the Ahusa
You sleep like the Opere
The matter is come to the highest point.
Regardless of kindness, regardless of the purchaser, the ungrateful man rides the horse over the rocks.
Though the porcupine be weary, the quills of its tail will not be weary
As the moon remains stationary above, and yet knows Oyo, the capital, so the king remains at home, and knows what his subjects are doing in the province.
Men think that the poor is not as wise as the rich; for if he were wise, why is he poor?
A proverb is the horse of conversation; when the conversation is lost, a proverb revives it: proverbs and conversation follow each other.
The fog spoils the face of the sky: gloominess prevents the sun from shining.
No one confesses that he has eaten yam with a knife that is lost.
The monkey is sure to tear the cloth of any one who is like himself.
The filthy man lays out his money in whatever pleases him; so does the gay man with his money.
"I almost killed the bird!" said the sportsman. "No one can eat almost in a stew"
A man fallen into a pit, need not hasten to get home: a frog fallen into a hole, need not hurry to get out.
He is as persuasive as a seller of cakes.
The great wild boar is not easy to encounter.
The great one is trying to show off a little.
The pin is driven into the ground; the question now is how to pull it out.
Though an Agarawu fall into a ditch, yet he will not die.
Though the white man's gauze came all the way over the sea, yet what cloth may be compared to cloth of Akese cotton?
As the banana by the water-side sends forth moisture, so the fish in the water retains its beauty.
The poisonous cassava has no good qualities; in vain does it appear like the yam.
A lazy man seeks easy employment: he would never choose a laborious one.
The man with the knotted club.
If you send no one to the market, the market will send no one to you.
The European trader sells his goods to the Egun: the Egun sells them again with the string round them
The good genius of every eater does not permit fire to depart from the
earth.
From the time that the owner of the world appeared in the world, the world began.
Covetousness is the father of disease.
A tree belonging to an avaricious man, bore abundantly; but instead of gathering the fruit he took an axe and cut it down
A man must openly practise the duties of relationship, though he may privately belong to a secret association: when he has attended to this, he must attend to that also, because when he dies, it is his relations who must bury him.
The crane is a king of birds, and the owner of the beautiful white feathers.
The husband's death is the widow's sorrow.
The millepede must have known the way before it became blind.
The person who might have used his strength, did not use his strength; the person who might have used force, did not use force ; the millipede, which has 200 hands and 200 feet, acts gently.
Laziness lends a helping hand to fatigue: one must persevere, because fatigue must be felt every day.
If a child is not old enough to be an eye-witness of ancient matters, he must be content with hearsay.
A chicken having been preserved from death, complained that it was not permitted to feed openly on the dunghill.
Thanks are due to the shoulders, which keep the shirt from slipping off.
A gift is a gift, a sale is a sale, but no one will thank you for "I have sold it cheap."
Because the water-bird knows how to swim, the other birds are envious.
A cutting word is as tough as a bowstring: a cutting word cannot be healed, though a wound may.
Though a man may miss other things, he never misses his mouth.
The viper allows no insolence.
If the mud in the Ijesa country adheres to one, it will not be washed off.
An eye-servant promises friendship ; but he despises you behind your back.
The good genius of the head prospers the owner of the head, and not the crab on the bank of the river.
A thing thrown forward will surely be overtaken; a thing planted in the ground will be there to dig up: but if nothing has been thrown forward, what shall be overtaken? and if nothing has been planted, what shall be dug up?
A weeper weeps and goes her ways; but one who dwells on painful recollections, weeps and never ceases.
The morass is an obstruction to the people of Bese town.
As the Segge does not regard the king's messenger, so the rain does not respect great men.
A confined room, containing nought but pins.
The god that would not be pleased when they tried to please it, the god that would not be propitiated when they tried to propitiate it, must take up its abode in the highway.
A gun is not to be beld carelessly.
They all distort their faces.
It is hard as the eye of a smoked fish, which the teeth cannot break.
The borrower who does not pay, gets no more money lent to him.
The glutton having eaten to the full, calls his companions also to come
The vengeance which the fowls imprecate on the fox, do I imprecate on you !
Gold should be sold to him who knows the value of it.
The mosquito makes a bold attempt without arms to accomplish it.
A hen that has many chickens
The monkey having one day eaten to the full, desires that his fore teeth may be drawn.
The monkey winked its eye: the young one thrust its finger into it.
You profess to know how to ride: how is it that your horse's leg is broken?
It is only the water that is spilt; the calabash is not broken.
You are strong as an Adiba.
A poor man makes market with his shoulder
Old woman cannot see.
They keep requital for country
I let pass what I might have made palaver about that he may do so to me in return.
A knot in the tree spoils the axe; famine spoils friendship.
He grinds a man as one rubs something on a grater.
The fish gives laws to the fishes.
You drink flood and ebb
The tide carries me in and out.
The soil is bad for tbe corn, it becomes good for nothing.
A man who talks of others behind their backs, another will talk of him in like manner.
The fish has been kept over one tide.
Do not cause his bowels to wither.
That man is as frigid in his manner as cold water.
We should pray to God only, for G-od hears the prayers which man addresses to him.
The yawner says, he does not walk alone; if there be no one to follow him, the leaves of the trees will fall.
He secures the canoe by giving earnest-money.
These coppers are the earnest-money of the bamboo palm, so that I claim to buy the palm-wine, when it is drawn.
Your teeth in your mouth are perfect, firmly compacted together, like a cluster of palm-oil nuts.
His heart lies quiet like limpid water.
The house is rubbed quite clean.
He reaps the benefit of the respect in which his father was held.
The small tree-climbing plant adheres to the large one, and thus grows big,
The cricket cries, the year changes.
While the rain fell, he did not place his jar; now that it is over, he takes his jar and places it.
If the goat has anything, he eats it with the fowl; if the fowl gets his portion, he goes up on the roof of the house.
If the Creator does not like a man, the vulture will not descend
He who falls by his foot shall rise again; he who falls by his mouth shall not rise.
That man makes his house big.
He who comes early to climb knows the palm-nut which has the fly.
He left an overhanging shade, and the other entered it.
He falls upon me.
He gives titles to his mother.
I am unworthy to grind pepper for his food.
He dies with the man he has killed, in retaliation for killing a man.
The smallest antelope in Calabar: it is said to indulge much in sleep; hence, a drowsy fellow.
The leaf of the plum-tree is not close to the fruit; the tongue of one man upon another is bad.
You turn into a running sore, as a boil does.
He prepares something which may be buried with him
He speaks ironically to me.
One monkey does not like another to get a belly-full.
I wish to see face and back.
Face and back meet and talk.
Man looks only on the outside of things; God looks into the very heart.
It is the sea only which knows the bottom of the ship, so God only knows the time of death.
He burns one part of the tree, and with the other he cooks food.
The tongue is a person of skill, dwelling in the same place with the teeth.
The young of the shrimp surpasses the young of the large fish.
He did that thing as if it were Ederi.
It has not lost a tooth.
The rain shall not beat on my grave.
The animal escapes the trap, and stands in dread of a bent stick.
A man sauntering has no business.
I beseech you, friends, do not behead the antelope on account of its long neck.
Don't take a man before the palaver-house, and give a blind man the beheading of him.
The flood takes me in, and the ebb takes me out.
His opinions are like water in the bottom of a canoe, going from side to side.
Says the bald-headed woodpecker, he was goiDg to market ; lie was not going to the drum at Itu; but the drum was so pleasant, that he turned aside and danced
The Ekpeberusun says, "Times are not always alike; sometimes he lifts the ball of dung, and throws it to the ground sometimes it lifts him, and throws him to the ground."
If he had a foot, it would come out through the belly of a cow.
You lament not the dead, but lament the trouble of making a grave; the way of the ghost is longer than the grave.
The tree-knot spoils the axe; hunger spoils love.
The rat says, "Put plenty of food in the trap, for he takes his neck and goes: he risks his neck."
The forest is full of pit-falls; the antelope crooks itself, bends its body in the narrow turnings, in order to escape.
He mounts on the back of the elephant.
He loves to the eye.
He keeps his eye on the door.
As an old torn basket on a farm road, so the world does not like a sick man.
The world speaks truth to a man as play.
The ground slopes; the antelope leans to one side in walking.
The time of Esefe and Akpara.
My life is set upon her.
Your life is like a tobacco-pipe
I shall do that thing, by Esunkomonko!
The okro hears the time of harvest and bears fruit, reproducing itself; it hears the dry season and perishes.
The small bird shoots away, exhausts all your arrows, avoiding them easily from its small size.
A stream coming down won't let you swim up.
If the sap of Etiridon go into the eye of any one, it becomes a cataract.
Ekpo says he belongs to the world; the world says he belongs to Ekpo.
Nwariwa stands with clustering fruit and says, "An orphan is a slave."
A kingfisher cannot afford an allowance for dividing it; a dead animal has no ears.
Pepper bites the throat; the world loved me when I was a child.
Do you wish to make me your peace-offering, your scape-goat?
Water rests in the place it should rest, finds its level.
He redeems the road.
She redeems herself.
It sticks in my teeth.
He turns away his face from that word.
The dry season makes one feel lightsome.
He floats on the surface like oil.
He was lucky for me at the opening of the day.
That chief is no longer good for anything.
Blow your belly.
The dust of the grave touches me, or causes a nattering sensation in the neck or back of the shoulders, when one feels wearied when digging a grave.
He assumes the appearance or practices of a leopard.
Even a miser does not refuse his cook part of what he roasts.
He has a good head.
He is as familiar with your affairs as if he were a member of your family.
A man does not use one finger to take out an arrow.
Do not die!
The demon possesses him: he is a demoniac.
He enquires at Idion, when going through his tricks.
The attempt exceeds the ability of one, not of a multitude.
An elephant will reach to the roof of the house.
The naked class.
You are wisdom itself.
By yourself, wisdom destroys you; with another, you destroy wisdom.
He is possessed of Ifot.
I will take away the fetish from the drink.
He puts all into his lap.
Some one takes and puts it in his lap.
He obtains it easily
He goes after his pleasure.
I beseech thee let us remain in this house in quietness.
The deliverance hangs up the pepper.
I gave you advice; you tied it to some grass and tossed it away; having done so, you lighted a torch and went about seeking it.
A beat-breast.
The monkey hears the cough of the hunter's attendant, but does not hear the monkey's own.
Did you go to the tortoise bush?
He wipes his feet at that place.
If the fruit should produce the branches, then justice might come forth for the friendless.
the wild guinea fowl says he sees no snare above; should he see one he should die.
the clay does not take a man, and the world continues to see him.
You put your hand under the tortoise-shell.
The tortoise and the snail, their backs are the same.
A gift given after coming under the eye is no gift: I sit in my house and unexpectedly receive a gift, then my heart is glad.
Time causes remembrance.
The eye is a thief.
If he has hand and mouth too; but to have mouth only is not good.
He is sweet as salt in your mouth.
This water is like wife and husband.
The sea rejects the dead fish; it does not seem to have been in the ocean.
The thought travels quicker than the foot; if the foot should travel at the thought's rate, you would call me a bad boy.
The standing of a bird is just his perching.
The crab says he does not fight nor quarrel, but he will bear his back in the calabash
A thing touched by another, which the proud man cannot use till it is wiped.
He has but one word.
There is no worse curse than to desire a man's death.
He swims like a basket of salt
He sends his threat to you.
The cat has not a farthing's worth of oil, yet he says he will feast on Iwewe.
One knows not the stability of his life
The fish when grown big returns to his rivulet.
It is good for a man to bear trouble rather than die.
His wealth is superior to him.
He gives up a man as his substitute to be killed
He gives up a man to liquidate his fine.
The Kere says, "Men must think of doing work, as the time for work has come."
His life lies upon you.
He is a large tree on which all things hang, if he falls, all perish.
They cut off his birth
Nick the bamboo that rums across the roof.
The medicine-man changes your soul and gives you that of another.
He wipes his trouble on his cheek.
The two-mouthed man; his canoe will turn bottom up.
He shut her up to fatten
Do you seclude yourself?
The boy tries on a waistcloth
The planter of koko wishes but a seedling.
They will destroy you as men destroy the yam-cuts.
Where shall I get a spot to plant a fence? The abode of the tale-bearer is worse than death.
He throws them Mbiam.
A stone is a good market thing, but it is a burden.
The bad tree, like the crooked sugar-cane, says he will not straighten; he breaks.
The sea from its birth knew the bottom of the canoe; a piece of drift wood, you float there and are nothing.
He bestowed benefits on this lewd man, and the fellow turned out haughty.
He beats me shamefully
A man always breaking off from his work never finishes anything.
The colt's-foot leaf eats the thing on the ground.
I have a presentiment of evil.
He who asks questions hears the language
The mudfish is a small thing, but it has big eyes.
The small yam says he will not be a boy for two years.
The people of Mbiaekon are as abundant as the leaves of the forest.
He drinks palm wine like the Mfanifa
One plantain pulled off the bunch does not finish the plantain; biting off a little of the Arata does not finish the Arata.
The rat enters the trap, the trap catches it; if it did not go into the trap, the trap would not do so.
My badness is more manifest than my goodness; you lock up my goodness in the room, and you sell my badness in the market.
The shade circles.
This tree grows like water
The tide carries me back.
The one who passed before you saw the eye of the spring.
The old net catches animals, the new does not.
The wheel of Fortune has two states; sometimes exalts one, sometimes depresses him.
When noise fills the bush the antelope goes aside.
God creates dreams.
I see the trace of the leopard where he has washed his hands
I present you with dainty food.
The Ndion follows beauty; why does mine follow me?
The foot takes the wise man to his dwelling, and the wise man takes the foot to the public street.
He has great consolation
Put chalk in water and drink it: Abasi saves you.
Don't let the gunpowder get above the chalk.
If you were medicine you would be very bitter.
The kernel and the oil-nut have one mother.
He dives like a free man.
The one edible snail does not demand of the other that he walk quick.
It is good that equals consort together.
He beats the Nkene, and proclaims his exploits.
the small bat surpasses the tortoise in knowledge.
"If I had known" stands behind; it does not come forward.
You have not caught the locust which you say belongs to the child.
You are an omnium-gatherum.
The crab bit you, and you go and beat the water.
A straight road has no turnings.
He gives an emphatic denial
He plants a man-trap.
The king of birds says he keeps on speaking, although the forest is big.
She has many eggs in her womb.
Take an egg and look at it.
The life of man is like the egg of a fowl; it drops out of one's hand, and falls to the ground and perishes.
The life of man is like the leaf of the Koko vegetable
Teach him industry that he may be able to work for his livelihood
The palm tree drops by degrees and fills the pot.
You are their football.
The train of Abiakpo is no more, and men laugh.
He puts ashes in your bag
When a man sees sunshine he dries his tobacco.
If the fire consumes the civet cat, how much more the skin of the bush cat?
The mollusc did not buy Egbo, yet wears a hat.
The small dragon-fly has made the Iguana deaf.
You are an Obin-uqua.
The basket-cover at the market breaks the market; the shield breaks the battle.
Its vileness is good.
The eater of pepper is like to die of pain; the sojourner is like to die of questions.
The moon refuses food.
It pricks, he laughs.
The elephant is said in size to reach to the roof; but you know it is not so big.
Do not bring your bad fortune on me
He comes forth and lies at my very face
He who cut the bush down did not take a tortoise; will he who lops the branches take one?
Coppers have no place where they are thrown away.
The Omon baboon is shaggy.
He is straight as an Oton
You cry like an Owuri
The road is fair but crooked.
How immense the riches!
The sickness afflicts me till it leaves me
My eyes are dry.
The king-fisher bodes me good or evil
Move a little off! move a little off! deprives a man of his seat.
Shift a little, make it large
A man knows not whether he will see to-morrow.
The thief withdraws not his foot, desists not from his theft, the liar desists not from his lie; they go on.
The pipe is small, the smoke is not small.
The daughters of a great man go off quickly in market, and are easily vendible
O God, I beseech thee make me strong to walk; my foot is feeble as a young child staggering.
Reverence your elder, for the man excelling in age excels in wisdom.
His blood will lie on you to your hurt
He showers his words on me as a man scatters sand.
The son disgraces his father by bad conduct.
The rain spoils your gentility.
He eats and is at ease
He does not keep himself quiet in the town; he does that which tends to his own destruction.
God strikes you down as the trap strikes down the rat.
Many destroy themselves by falsehood.
Their evil deeds will remain with them
Inspirit me.
The small fish the shrimp has the whole river to swim in, but it keeps by the side.
A cask half filled with water makes one unsteady in his gait.
You roll the medicine in the hand and it pains you; how will it do when dropped into the eye? will not the eye fall out?
The controversy of Grod follows the sin of man.
He assumes office by sending round the usual gifts
You try to knock your foot against that which will wound you.
I invoke your hand
He calls upon his father.
He throws back his head.
They plant "Obeah" for him.
He who eats with the tortoise knows his right hand.
The hind foot of the goat is planted on the same spot on which it planted the fore foot.
The purposing of that thing tires me
Do not beat yourself
Do not judge tyrannously
It is not worth talking about a slip of the foot as if it were a fall.
She laughs sillily, like the eldest daughter of Okori
The lizard cannot clasp round the cotton-tree to climb; the thief has nothing, and steals.
That which is close to the cotton-tree receives the dew from the cotton-tree.
You are as bad as an Ukpaha-ekpo
The Ukpek says, if all were like him the smith would not make a fish-spear.
He has a strong soul
His shadow makes him sick.
His dirninutiveness is beautiful
This is the finishing of the house
The foot turns and ties the hand
I knocked my lucky foot to-day
The completion of your work will be some other time
He is an incorrigible fool.
The ghost says, They are of the living
He eats more than suffices him
That man has a bend in his neck.
The miser and the niggard are alike; but the miser is better than the niggard, for the miser brings out a thing he may have put in store and gives, the niggard never gives.
The white man strips off his house.
A needle is as valuable as a heap of iron bars
Your mouth is like the Uquok
God sends man to market; when, you have made your market, you must lift your basket and off.
You are drunk as a snake
The thread of his life breaks
Plate of birth
Plate of vow.
The feast of God
Your father did so, and hence ill-fortune befalls you.
He takes my return
The stars fill the sky; the voice of a woman given to hatred vexes her husband.
The Iguana says, Let him be pursued in the first start; if he be pursued in the first start, he will be caught.
Ramming down the grave of a great man.
If the ear were an eye I would close it
I will remain alone rather than have a slanderer for my companion.
The chicken says, the warmth of his mother's body is better than milk.
It does not feel the warmth of a mother's breast.
A bad influence comes from, that man's body; you must not touch him.
I went to the market and turned aside to eat fruit cake; the fruit cake of the market took me unwittingly with its sweetness.
The fire burned your mouth in eating the thing roasted; a man declares himself jour enemy, and you go and make friends with him.
He grasps a handful of sand, and throws it at a place, thereby renouncing intercourse with it
Salute a superior with Ubok
Thought breaks the heart.
I lay to heart the debt you owe me
My thoughts evade me
He unmasks the hero
A quiet man gets angry even to death
The Whydah finch does not dress herself in the working time.
He smears himself with oil along with you.
He upbraids me with the gift which he gave to me.
He cut his hair and sent it to all old calabar, saying, if he died they should inquire concerning him
Old Calabar can inflict any injury it pleases on the countries around; should any of these injure Old Calabar, it may go break its neck
It is the stoinach which rules the man.
Idu is as the sand in the yard
It is in Ononkoni
He loves fighting as much as Nkuo
The razor of God
First eye of sleep
The first-born son is not two or three; if two, one is from Ibo a slave.
That word is bitter as the fruit of a shrub.
You eat like a grub.
He slanders me without naming me
The stick with three fish
The flesh of the hen is a thing from which I abstain.
He has great equanimity; if a man does him good he does not express his feelings; if bad he is still silent.
Connected with a great man, you will advance.
He plays bird.
The frog calls for rain, rain comes.
The Isana says he eats no food, he eats the wind in the bush.
A sitting in one place makes a man sleep.
The longing for my native land seizes me
Knowledge is better than riches.
Somebody has done it for you, so you say you beat me; if you and I had been left to ourselves, how could you have beaten me?
He gives it of his goodness
Though he look so fierce, never mind, he can do nothing.
He holds himself something superior.
You have become naked
The goat feels panting
He is not with sweetness of body
Make it strong with strength
He is with a sharp mouth
Clouds of sun
He has sent the curse.
He knows the days before and he knows the days behind.
The sun grows dark
You sit above a cow
This ram has no Onyenh
My musket after use needs oiling.
Give a dog a bone, and he will break and eat: so will we the town of our enemy.
Goat's blood is goat's blood
What I speak in the debate, I will enact in the field: there is a fish in the river called Pataseh.
Let a man stuff himself at night, and he is heavy in the morning: that man is a fool.
If one partly destroys a country, one is not likely to return in open day, but will take advantage of the darkness of night.
Where war is, there the drum will be.
The readiest way to sell, is to cry your goods through the streets.
Although a snake casts away beads and sheds its skin, it cannot change its colour; nor can I my word.
Beans, though dried in burning fire, can, by introducing the finger, be taken out and eaten.
Fetish men never initiate the poor.
Spitting makes the belly more comfortable, and the outstretched hand will be the receiving one.
When the wolf goes abroad, the sheep must fly.
Let the king grant war speedily  let not our energies be damped. Fire cannot pass through water!
In the days of our ancestors the white trader brought good articles. A musket then lasted twenty years; now, three.
If the leopard kills her prey, does she not feed her young? If the hind brings forth her young, does she not nibble grass for it?
We think that poverty surpasses in desire the torments of covetousness beyond computation.
The poorest person in the world is not the one without money but the one without vision. 
If the leader of the hunting party gets tired, then all are tired
The river may be wide, but it can be crossed.
Do not let what you cannot do tear from your hands what you can do.
A stone is never overturned by the wind.
Good behavior must start from the top.
When there is peace in the community, the chief does not carry a shield.
A boat does not know who the leader is. When it turns over, everyone gets wet.
Much talking does not make you a leader.
Patience is the key to solving all problems.
By trying often, the monkey learns to jump from the tree.
He who refuses to obey cannot command.
She who has not reached her destination never gets tired.
A storm may destroy the fields, but bad manners will destroy the nation.
A leader who does not take advice is not a leader.
A good leader was once a good follower.
With many captains, the ship does not sail properly.
One does not refuse water to the digger of wells.
The hunter in pursuit of an elephant does not stop to throw stones at birds.
Provided no person stunts or destroys a sprouting palm seed, it will definitely grow into a palm tree.
Readiness has no fears.
A leader does not listen to rumors.
When you are asked to look up, never lose sight of what is on the ground.
It is playing for children and an emergency for the butterfly.
To lose the way is to learn the way.
If the townspeople are happy, look for the chief.
A good chief is like a forest: everyone can go there and get something.
A good chief is like a strong tree with many branches: people like to sit in its shade.
We do not look at another persons clock in order to work.
The small gazelle runs to save its life, but the lion chases to fill its belly.
In order to find what we need when we want it, we put all that we need in a bundle
I am strong alone.
Greediness has tiered the mouth of the hippopotamus.
I am going has finished food from the storehouse.
Even the fool has relative.
The fool starts in his blood.
The hawk is strong at the chicks.
The hawk looks old.
Darkness can’t lead darkness.
The excess perforates the drum.
The hare killed her mother because he thought that the day will not come.
The reed itches while with others.
The termite attracts you in his hole.
The pot presses the crown
You don’t throw broken pot.
Only the fire can break a strong calabash.
Once one has a baby there is hope to have another.
Keeping quiet is better than refusing.
The gazelle gives birth to its kind.
I know much broke Gayo’s tooth.
The hump is not a burden for its holder.
The unfortunate animal gives birth during dry season.
The maize grows for people who don’t have teeth.
Imitating things led the frog to have his ears cut.
You add your own arm besides what the king has given you.
Excessive beggary has burned the lake.
What is said spreads.
Curse has no cure.
Hare’s ham eats elephant ham.
Wagtail luck in not for every bird.
Docility make you wear cloth made from castrated animal.
The evening does not recognize morning good deed.
Goodness has killed the ape.
Herb produces beans.
The distance diminishes the elephant.
The distance has swallowed the elephant.
The termite burned the partridge’s head.
You can’t collect poured milk.
Eating is better than clothing.
There is no rock of problems.
Poverty provokes disparagement.
Poverty betrays people.
Poverty chasses brownness.
The misery has killed his king.
The day of your death, you can’t know.
The excrement has choked the hen.
The porcupine eats what is around its terrier.
The porcupine chases the pangolin.
One hand finishes the porridge from the basin.
You see men on the return.
People meet, only mountains don’t.
Uprightness is more powerful than physical strength.
The cow eats at the measure of its teeth.
The cow that roams too much can’t produce milk.
To pull a strong cow, you need another strong cow.
Cow brings people to women
The darkness swallows the white cow.
To return behind is death.
To remain behind is to be responsible for closing the door.
Glory has burned the guinea-fowl's head.
Lateness has burned Pabidi.
What was not possible for the hatchet can’t be possible for the hoe.
What has removed the scorpion from the water, under the rock.
What has removed the hippopotamus from the water.
A useless thing cleanses the dog’s teeth.
A visitor hen eats under the hedge.
The hen takes what it can swallow.
The dog does not eat for nothing.
Don’t provoke a dog that is sleeping in the cinders.
The dog dislikes his defender.
The stomach speaks more than the mouth.
You eat with your enemy.
You don’t remove herb from your own eye.
You don’t bite the back of the person carrying you.
When a leaf of a plant falls, it can’t return again at its former location.
The ear can't underestimate the head.
The artisan eats in residue.
The person who likes eating is not the one who works.
You repair the door of the destitute.
The hunter sees himself in his calabash.
The foolish can’t soften in the mortar.
Your enemy kills you.
The King’s successor is clearly seen.
The merciful person dies in dust.
The coward asks his wife.
A single man eats cold food.
A bad person eats what people have sung on.
A lazy person has sharp teeth.
The stubborn person sculls in air.
The swimmer dies by the shore.
The recidivist eats problems.
You don’t deny seeds to destitute people.
The intelligent person eats bread with the meat at your hand.
You pierce buffalo from a hiding place.
You climb a tree from the bottom.
Elders stay in the dust-bin.
People know by what you have.
You don’t show stars to someone who is sleeping on his back.
You don’t teach fish how to swim.
You don’t pursue two partridges at the same time.
You attract termite with reed.
Only a fool tests the depth of a river with both feet.
Knowledge is like a garden: If it is not cultivated, it cannot be harvested.
Sugarcane is sweetest at its joint.
Don’t set sail using someone else’s star.
The best way to eat an elephant in your path is cut him up into little pieces.
A restless feet may walk into a snake pit.
A chick that will grow into a cock can be spotted the very day it hatches.
After a foolish deed comes remorse.
A man who pays respect to the great paves the way for his own greatness.
A roaring lion kills no game.
If a child washes his hands he could eat with kings.
Rain does not fall on one roof alone.
Life is like a shadow and a mist; it passes quickly by, and is no more.
Wherever a man goes to dwell, his character goes with him.
Do not look where you fell, but where you slipped.
An old woman is always uneasy when dry bones are mentioned in a proverb.
By the time the fool has learned the game, the players have dispersed.
Even though the old man is strong and hearty, he will not live forever.
What is bad luck for one man is good luck for another.
Fire and gunpowder do not sleep together.
Hunger is felt by a slave and hunger is felt by a king.
The lizard that jumped from the high Iroko tree to the ground said he would praise himself if no one else did.
Money is sharper than a sword.
A proud heart can survive a general failure because such a failure does not prick its pride.
If you are in hiding, don’t light a fire.
If you don’t stand for something, you will fall for something.
When the cock is drunk, he forgets about the hawk.
When the fool is told a proverb, its meaning has to be explained to him.
Only when you have crossed the river, can you say the crocodile has a lump on his snout.
Rain beats a leopard’s skin, but it does not wash out the spots.
The sun will shine on those who stand before it shines on those who kneel under them.
When a man is coming toward you, you need not say: “Come here.”
When a man is wealthy, he may wear an old cloth.
A man’s grave is by the roadside.
When you follow the path of your father, you learn to walk like him.
It is no shame at all to work for money.
It is the calm and silent water that drowns a man.
The poor man and the rich man do not play together.
A bad name is like a stigma.
When you are rich, you are hated; when you are poor, you are despised.
You can tell a ripe corn by its look.
You must judge a man by the work of his hands.
The moon moves slowly, but it crosses the town.
People should not talk while they are eating or pepper may go down the wrong way.
When a man says yes, his chi says yes also.
One cannot both feast and become rich.
When the moon is shining the cripple becomes hungry for a walk.
It is the fool’s sheep that break loose twice.
The wise create proverbs for fools to learn, not to repeat.
Every woman is beautiful until she speaks.
One who causes others misfortune also teaches them wisdom
Ears that do not listen to advice, accompany the head when it is chopped off.
He who refuses to obey cannot command.
You do not teach the paths of the forest to an old gorilla.
An army of sheep led by a lion can defeat an army of lions led by a sheep.
You are beautiful because of your possessions.
Instruction in youth is like engraving in stone.
He who fears the sun will not become chief.
He who is destined for power does not have to fight for it.
A large chair does not make a king.
You are beautiful, but learn to work, for you cannot eat your beauty.
When you follow in the path of your father, you learn to walk like him.
Having beauty doesn’t mean understanding the perseverance of marriage.
He who thinks he is leading and has no one following him is only taking a walk.
Money is not the medicine against death.
Speak softly and carry a big stick; you will go far.
If the cockroach wants to rule over the chicken, then it must hire the fox as a body-guard
If there is character, ugliness becomes beauty; if there is none, beauty becomes ugliness.
There can be no peace without understanding.
A close friend can become a close enemy.
Money can’t talk, yet it can make lies look true.
He who earns calamity, eats it with his family.
A single bracelet does not jingle
If you want to go quickly, go alone. If you want to go far, go together.
Milk and honey have different colours, but they share the same house peacefully.
It takes a whole village to raise a child.
When a king has good counselors, his reign is peaceful.
He who does not know one thing knows another.
One falsehood spoils a thousand truths.
A fight between grasshoppers is a joy to the crow.
He that digs up a grave for his enemy, may be digging it for himself.
A bird will always use another birds’ feathers to feather its own nest.
A person is a person because of other persons.
When two elephants fight, it is the grass that gets trampled.
Two small antelopes can beat a big one.
When there is peace in the country, the chief does not carry a shield.
The mouth which eats does not talk.
A child’s fingers are not scalded by a piece of hot yam which his mother puts into his palm.
As the dog said, ‘If I fall down for you and you fall down for me, it is playing.’
If you offend, ask for a pardon; if offended forgive.
A small house will hold a hundred friends.
It is Mr. Old-Man-Monkey who marries Mrs. Old-Woman-Monkey.
Those whose palm-kernels were cracked for them by a benevolent spirit should not forget to be humble.
Wood already touched by fire is not hard to set alight.
The old woman looks after the child to grow its teeth and the young one in turn looks after the old woman when she loses her teeth.
The one who loves an unsightly person is the one who makes him beautiful.
Dogs do not actually prefer bones to meat; it is just that no one ever gives them meat.
Do not call the forest that shelters you a jungle.
The ruin of a nation begins in the homes of its people.
A wise man who knows proverbs, reconciles difficulties.
When a woman is hungry, she says, “Roast something for the children that they might eat.”
Looking at a king’s mouth one would never think he sucked his mother’s breast.
There is no medicine to cure hatred.
If you get a fine harvest of maize don’t break your local brotherhood and sisterhood.
A stick that was used to beat your co-wife, should not be kept under your bed
Let us go again because the first journey succeeds
Monkeys of the same age play together
He, who shakes his head, refuses to be shaved.
A boat moves using it’s back
An egg advised a bird
I could dance but the lump on my back doesn’t allow me.
Warthog don’t minimize porcupine, he is the owner of the cave.
What the baby eats, is also what his guardian will eat
A child becomes the way he was brought up
Naming our clans is not tribalism
My father's machete is the chirpiest.
A marriage which has children never ends
He who has two cheeks cannot be burnt by porridge
Once you choose to enter a bush don’t fear the dew
If you are dumped by a girl never commit suicide.
Something good never last.
A man is like a cassava stick
A baboon run from it’s faeces
More go where there is more.
Where there are nice trees, that means there are no house builders.
Where a steeplejack hummers more, becomes either smooth or rough.
monkey’s ears listen while already in the a pot
He who was scared by an alligator rans away when he sees a drum made by its skin.
A fowl’s legs scratch for its chicks only.
Never excrete in a hut even if you are about to quit it.
He who tells you is more than the one who gives you.
A village is seen to be large during the day
A woman is like heap of straw which cover other things while its own roots are wet.
Water that you have poured on yourself never makes you feel cold.
A tree on a hill in the savannah is a meeting place for birds.
Orphans learn when parents advise their children.
An ear can hear even what does not belong it
What your brother eats, your own mouth eats.
A Trunk of a tree which will make a nice drum no one knows where it will come from.
If your fellow catches a warthog, collect firewood for him.
Both a tree and antelope are found in the forest
Those who are not at the drum scene are the ones who enjoy the beat most.
He who did not climb cannot eat fruits from the top of the branches.
Nothing good comes in an empty stomach
Never talk to yourself, walls have hears
Two clever persons can't roast a liver.
A fine beans is known through its leaves.
Something without a guardian will end up eaten by a dog.
What you lost will be found by your own
A Word is like a fruit; once it falls down it cannot return up.
You can eat meat of an animal that a minor killed but you can’t believe when you see his snare that catches it.
A thorn is always removed through where it entered.
While the warthog killer is still in the forest, the planner is in the village.
A child learns after breaking a calabash.
Take care of what belongs to you
A river flows through its bed
Eat or drink a medicine while too hot is not the guarantee for cure.
Even a heel likes to be washed.
It's always the first blow, which kills a snake.
Stagnant water is always dangerous.
The hand washes another
If you swear not to remember those who died, it means those who are alive are doing good things to you.
Once swallowed it’s not sweet anymore.
He who did not go to the bush with his father ends up being tied up using a fake rope.
No one defeated them, it’s the heart which defeated them.
Sterility is a shining stain.
It’s hard for someone who carries a smelling meat to find another.
The razor’s sharpness that made the nose hides its hairs.
Leopard’s soup is drank by a dog
Elder’s mouth can smell but never lies.
Where the savanna is soft, that is where the elephant’s path is.
The owner of a drum cannot borrow it, he always comes and picks it.
Like ants eat little and carry the rest to your home.
A foreign hen never picks up a fortune.
He who will go tomorrow, will find tomorrow has already gone.
A hump never sees how badly its core is, it always sees its friend’s.
Yours is what enters into your stomach
A minor is never right before an adult.
You never feel pain for a thorn which is in your friend’s body.
Do not swear that you will never go back to the river where you always forgot your calabash.
Gossip is harmful
Abroad, look but don’t speak
First remove a dust in your eye before you remove what is in your friend’s eye.
There are many generations but little pity.
The leopard’s owner never discloses its footprint
The one, who has dried cassava, is the one ready to receive visitors.
One naughty person cannot destroy an entire community.
A good woman is a crown to the husband.
Good people do not live long
A borrowed radio does not finish a habit
Dirty is what is on the food
The stick one is holding is the one used to beat a dog
The tail of a goat cleans where it is seated
When things are done with, they are done with. One needs not to retain to what is past
A thing is what you hold in your hands
The fear of god is the beginning of wisdom
A hand which gives receives in return
A bird sits on a tree it likes
Far distance water does not extinguish the fire here
Words of elders may miss a stone throw, but they never miss in what they say
Wisdom can be gotten from anyone, it is shared not a monopoly of one person
Together is not to bring fear, but rather a relation
We can only know where we are coming from, not where you are going
Monkeys laugh at each other’s red buttocks.
The hyena cries while leaning to something.
A child carries in him the characteristics of the mother and father.
Hating old friends because of a visitor will make you regret when the visitor goes.
A sweet potato cannot be straightened.
The world is a bone you just bite around and leave it.
The heart is responsible for cutting down a big tree. The axe is only an instrument.
What visits you is what eats you.
Marriage is a home.
What sleeps is the curd in an animal’s stomach.
What you eat in the darkness will be seen in your vomit.
The anus which farts will always fart another time.
Stolen things never really make one rich.
Young growing trees are the future forest.
A thief is the one you catch with your hands.
We are not obliged to answer a village announcement.
Pain is felt by the victim.
Bedroom issues are not to be taken outside.
Trees which are next to each other always brush against each other from time to time.
Only ghosts never meet.
Just because one had some luck in something does not mean you will be in luck also.
He who enquires can never eat toxic mushrooms.
There is no better place like home
Mother carry me, I will carry you as well in future.
It is during growing that a cock breaks its wing.
He, who does not take advice, went to the in-laws with feaces on his back.
One who journeys during the time of rains does not look to the skies.
Over happiness many breed sadness.
The youth are the future of tomorrow.
Though she may be dirty she is your mother.
A hen does not choose among its young.
One, who always says I will go tomorrow, finished the food in the store.
Pass there, I will pass there is not a good friend to journey with.
Take care of the neck, necklaces are not difficult to find.
We do not insult the crocodile before crossing the river.
We do not put a rat in a bag of ground nuts.
We don’t look at a visitor’s face but at his stomach.
Things don’t meet twice
The monkeys near to each other share the fruits they have.
Walking together is not to bring fear, but rather a relation.
It is the feathers which makes a chicken big.
The crow does not worry about the cleverness of a chicken.
The day you are unfortunate even food turns cold.
If you wish to challenge a fly you have to defecate at three places.
Before you get annoyed about farting and spoiling the air, you assume that they have eaten beans.
We have to face challenges
Starting a journey before others does not mean reaching before them.
Friendship is more than family.
The fastness of a short runner is in starting the race early.
One who is poor will only improve their status by working hard.
We do not look at the mouth of the one crying.
One piece of fire wood does not light a fire.
Do not rely on your friend to provide for you; fight your own battle.
A child who is poor will only improve their status by working hard.
The child of a generous person never starves.
For the viper to strengthen its bones, it has to lay on the path, so that people may step on it.
A fool’s arrows finish during testing.
A monkey’s visitor will eat what the monkey eats.
The weight of the salt is felt by the one carrying it.
An elderly person who is sited can still see further than a young person standing.
One finger cannot pick lice.
A child who does not listen grows beards on the neck.
It is always good to ask when we are not sure of things.
A child is a means for borrowing.
A son with bad habits never leaves them.
The child of a slave is educated where the king’s child is getting lessons.
A visitor does not whistle. If he or she whistles it means he or she is a singer.
A visitor does not crush bones; if he does it means in his place he swallows them whole.
A slave dies with issues in the mind.
The family is like a bowl of soup. Even if it bends the soup never pours.
One who enters a thicket does not fear small noises.
One will always return for an axe or hoe handle the woman shows them.
If you wish to grab something from the chicken’s beak, you need to do it gently.
When a case has embarrassing details or elements, it will be told like that.
One who does not express gratitude is a child of a witch.
One with a bad habit never leaves it.
One who marries your mother is your father.
He who feels cold is not shown the fire place.
On who makes you walk at night is thanked when it is day.
Indecisiveness is not good in life.
One who intends to swim does not just stand.
One who eats a guinea fowl does not turn to look like a guinea fowl.
One who moves with the Cobra is the one who shaves it.
Patience leads to an honorable position.
You can be punished as you do sin on the spot. But for others it can come later.
What was withheld as secret thought will come out through a slip of tongue.
An eye that the vultures peck at, does not see; an ear that the vultures peck at does not hear.
The weak cow will blame whoever pushes it for its fall; the weak woman will blame her husband’s death for her downfall.
The elephant does not get tired carrying his heavy tusks.
You may deny that you were fed, but your body will tell.
A rake recommends that it be used first to fetch the rubbish that is nearest.
One hand alone cannot wash the body.
The donkey lamented that while it was pleading for horns, its ears were cut off.
Hand was each other in turn.
While we know what to say, saying it that way is often difficult.
On a bad day children will flee from your sight.
While relatives exist, one cannot eat the sodom apple.
The ladle cannot serve anything if the pot is empty.
People who are on the verge of death do not hear the drum beat
This is amusing; said the dog when asked to guard a container of cheese.
A man dies, but his word lives forever.
The conditions that one can comfortably live with, might be unacceptable to another.
One who gives to earn praise will impoverish himself.
Observing God’s wonders; the baboon scratches his head with his leg.
The body of a wise man has eyes.
Lead a fool into the house but just show the path to the wise.
Even if the cow may give birth tomorrow, there has to be something to feed on till then.
Rivers flow into each other but stomachs do not.
It’s more pleasing to hear of someone busy with work, than hearing of them busy handling dispute.
I did not ask for a payback for a generous act, nor did expect it to disappear altogether.
Food that is rejected at one place is accepted at another.
Even people who share the same opinions have different individual thoughts.
A poor man’s ailment is like a wild animal wound.
Women’s say that it’s fairer for the blind man that his eyes are gouged out.
Why are you staggering like a rich man who is hungry; they ask.
Do not say woo, say woo, the hyena taught people the correct way to howl.
A poor man is detested by his own mother.
One greedy for food makes himself playful.
A horse that grazes, in the same field with donkey, learns how to fart.
Those who are thought to be dying are the old, but those who actually die are the young
The boy who wanted to cry was stepped on by a calf.
Optimism leads to riches and pessimism leads to poverty.
If an argument over ownership arises about stick, the person who originally cut it from the tree assumes ownership.
An old man said; I do not benefit from a lie and neither does a lie benefit from my lie
The plan kills, the weapon only does the deed.
The river is not a predator by itself but it takes you to a predator.
If generously shared, a flea can be bitten twice.
A house hold in which the owner is kept standing has no room for the guest to sit.
The cow requested to see the owner before being killed.
The eyes do not shy away from anything; they can dare to see the parents’ nakedness.
One cannot see oneself, a stone cannot push itself.
If facts are ignored, justice cannot be rendered yet, if one refuses to ignore the facts enemity is created.
Having not found another one she became the man’s undisputed wife.
The worst shall be revealed when the moon rises.
One does not eat swollen glands to appease a strong desire fort meat.
If one plan is out of hand another one remains.
Whoever stole my camel saw the knots of the calic wrapped around my waist.
While we bark for others we also bark for ourselves; said the dog.
The neck does not recognize that the head is heavy.
However long it may grow, the neck will never surpass the head.
When a person is carrying someone on his back, the one being carried gets tired before he does.
Where one lives it is good to be prominent if not it is better to live elsewhere.
Villagers do not marry one another if they do, they always meet their objections.
The arrival of an honoured guest does not warrant milking a pregnant cow.
One is not barred from referring to oneself.
If the woman takes over the house, the family she rules is doomed.
The past years are in moonlight, the years to come are in darkness.
Do not say; on God, and sleep on the road
A climbing plant with tendrils cannot grow on it’s own without the support of a tree.
Those who know you speak well about you; but one who is not liked or respected has to brag about himself.
One should either become a pillar or lean against one.
There is different hand writings, said qampiso gummi.
A poor man is like an orphaned ram.
One who travels at an unfavorable time comes home at a favorable time.
A clever child is one who looks up in morning and down in the afternoon.
One should understand what happens in one’s absence by relating to what used to happen in one’s presence.
When put in fire, a hide of skin crumples toward the fleshy side.
God is the companion of truth.
That which occurs at night will await down.
Evening has no supplement.
You play with fire because you have not seen it burn.
A mother will not hear the cry of her married daughter who is now living far away
When befriending people, the family of Hassan Gababa enters narrowly and leaves broadly.
Have you seen in a dry season the place you had seen during the rainy season?
A distant shelter does not shield one from cold.
A doctor is like a pit, one can not know when one will fall into it.
Do not fight for a coward, he will not fight for you. Similarly, do not support a fool in a dispute, he will not support you in yours.
What is certain is that which a man vows to undertake.
Men’s ideas helped to locate the snake.
A new born that comes in the right position relieves the mother and relieves itself.
The head that touches the ground a birth, will not fail to touch the ground at death
A blind man speaks the good old days before he became blind.
A wise man plans for tomorrow, a fool plans only for today.
Manhood is beneath the clothing.
In a friendly way, the oil spoils the cloth.
For the weak ones, fat is raw.
One builds a house for the future, not for the past.
The owner is entitled to first rights.
A person’s body is precious to him but nothing to someone else.
Sidam said, I was not annoyed by the mule that got lost without my knowledge but the needle that got lost due to my carelessness annoyed me.
It is better to drink blood that has no milk than to sleep hungry.
After the burrial the undertakers said, the body will not re-surface.
A poor man’s death is surprising and a mean man’s death is unbelievable.
Stop scratching the cockroach's scars.
Forget about effort, each person has his or her luck.
Love your enemy.
Your lips are your enemy.
Savings never go bad
Brains are wealth.
A person in love with a one-eyed person calls her or him 'cross-eyed'.
A person who wants you out of her or his place will not tell you, 'Get out!'
The person who laughs at another’s scar has not been wounded yet.
The one who loves does not take revenge.
He who doesn't know you, doesn't value you.
A person in need never gets tired.
After hardship comes relief.
Luck doesn't give a warning sign.
Blessings will stop if we forget Mother.
My luck can’t be stolen. God gave it to me. I didn’t steal it.
You don't live without working.
Life is the best gift; the rest is extra.
A good thing never lasts.
The medicine of malaria is quinine. What is the medicine for wickedness?
The world is knowledge.
The earth is round.
The world is walking around.
Education is an ocean
Might is right.
Jealousy is cold poison.
If you want to eat honey follow the bees.
The joy of a wedding is to love one another.
A good ship depends on the captain
Little and little, fills the measure.
Better a bee bite than hatred.
Better a still curtain than a flag blowing in the wind
The anger of a cuttlefish is the benefit for the fisher folk.
Better a still curtain than a flag blowing in the wind
If backbiting were financial capital, everyone would be rich.
If you are a real talker, why don’t you talk about yourself?
Work is the measure of a person.
A little is enough.
The chick that stands by its mother gets the thigh of the grasshopper.
The mother's basket is filled with nut grass.
Every good thing does not lack its proper praise.
Every good thing comes from God.
Each devil has its own place.
Delicious food is eaten with great desire.
Death is not without its advantages.
You stretch where it is bent.
To live a long time is to see much.
Eating is for everyone; it is not just a family affair.
Eat what comes from your work.
To aim is not to hit.
Getting pregnant isn’t work. The work is to raise the child.
It is no trouble to eat a kingfish, the trouble lies in washing it.
To give is to save, that is, not to throw away.
To get a youthful husband is not to get a child.
Getting is not cleverness and lacking is not stupidity.
To love each other is a blessing.
To give is something of the heart, not riches.
Friends by eyesight, but in the heart you are a hypocrite.
Your friend’s wealth is not yours.
The mother is a queen; her value is inestimable.
A Mother is like a king without any parallel in the world.
A mother’s milk is sweet.
Why go shopping for food when you have meat at home.
The one who chooses a hoe is not a farmer.
The best fertilizer is the shadow of the owner.
The one whom you think is the right one is the wrong one.
Whoever counts the mistakes of his or her friend can never love.
The messenger has no fault.
A fine wife is a husband’s good pillar.
A good wife is a home's adornment.
The wife is the husband.
The wife is the bedroom’s light.
A refugee is a person not a problem.
The ungrateful heart loses all.
The patient heart does not hurry.
Love the one who loves you.
The tailor does not choose the cloth.
The patient person eats ripe fruit.
One who wants all usually loses all.
If a big tree falls, the birds get anxious.
One tree does not make a forest.
A child never grows up to his or her parent.
You will die poor if you rely on relatives.
Somebody with a big mouth can never get a husband.
The one who asks God does not miss God’s offer.
He who preserves unripe fruit eats it when ripe.
Since God has planned for me why should you hate me.
The fisherperson knows where the octopus are.
Whoever drops his or her culture is a slave.
Don't help the child who doesn't feel the burden of his load.
The beginning is hard.
The person who goes slowly doesn’t stub his or her toe.
The lucky person doesn't miss out on the necessities of life.
One who waits does not miss.
A farmer will never go hungry.
Using a love potion is not my custom. To be loved is just luck.
A mother is incomparable.
I am afraid to be born, I am not afraid to be carried away.
I fear the lion for its jaws, I do not fear a person for his or her words.
I depend on my good fortune. I don't rely on anybody else.
Let’s enjoy the honey and ignore the bee and its sting.
When elephants jostle, what gets hurt is the grass.
A kind word is a flower to the heart.
If I am silent you say that when I speak trouble is just there.
I thought you were a good neighbor while you were just a spoiler.
I am here for a walk, not to gossip.
Because I love in my heart, I won’t forget in my mind.
The vines are yours, so eat slowly.
It’s hard to know what’s in the heart.
The way of the liar is short.
Good luck begins in the morning.
The bee fiercely guards its honey.
A home that has love does not lack good luck.
A dance is decorated by cheering.
If it does not irritate, it gets swollen.
Love brings blessings to the home.
Where there’s a will there’s a way.
A mother’s love does not end
Love is a flower, it doesn't need the sun.
Beat a drum not a child.
Examine well that you may profit accordingly.
Blessings are better than possessions.
A friend to the eye, hypocrisy in the heart.
The happiness on earth is peace and love.









